



commercial是什么意思_commercial的翻译_音标_读音_用法_例句_爱词霸在线词典

           小程序                            清除     最新热词                历史记录                    划译    划译      下载词霸Mac版     




                        commercial                    



英 [kəˈmɜ:ʃl]



美 [kəˈmɜrʃl]
















                                            考研                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                         /                                         

                                                                                        CET6                                                                                                                                                                                                                             /                                         

                                                                                                                                    CET4                                                                                                                                                                                 /                                         

                                                                                                                                                                                                                            TOEFL                                                                                         /                                         

                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                        IELTS                                                                                    







adj.

商业的；
贸易的；
营利的；
靠广告收入的



n.

（电台或电视播放的）广告；




变形

复数：
                                commercials 




















                        一键安装桌面版，查词翻译快三倍
                    








选择要添加的生词本

















                            新建生词本
                        

                            进入生词本
                            






    双语例句 句式用法 权威例句                   查看更多             来自《权威词典》     查看更多                查看更多       四级真题 六级真题        自2010年至今的四级考试中，  共出现过  次            自2010年至今的六级考试中，  共出现过  次           


柯林斯高阶英汉双解学习词典







1


ADJ
商业的;贸易的
Commercial means involving or relating to the buying and selling of goods.





Docklands in its heyday was a major centre of industrial and commercial activity...


港区在其最繁荣的时期曾是主要的工商业活动中心。






Attacks were reported on police, vehicles and commercial premises.


据报道，警察、车辆和商业经营场所均遭到袭击。





2


ADJ-GRADED
(组织、活动)营利的，商业化的，偏重利润的
Commercial organizations and activities are concerned with making money or profits, rather than, for example, with scientific research or providing a public service.





British Rail has indeed become more commercial over the past decade...


过去10年来，英国铁路确实变得更加商业化了。






Conservationists in Chile are concerned over the effect of commercial exploitation of forests...


对森林的商业开发所带来的影响让智利的自然资源保护者们感到忧心忡忡。





3


ADJ
(产品)商品化的，供市场出售的
A commercial product is made to be sold to the public.





They are the leading manufacturer in both defence and commercial products.


在军工产品和民用产品的制造方面，他们都处于领先地位。





4


ADJ
(车辆)商用的
A commercial vehicle is a vehicle used for carrying goods, or passengers who pay.





Commercial vehicles, coaches and lorries are required by law to be fitted with tachographs.


法律规定商用车辆、长途汽车和卡车要安装转速计。






...the fastest crossing of the Atlantic by a commercial passenger vessel.


商用客船最快的一次横渡大西洋





5


ADJ
(电视、广播)靠广告收入维持的，商业性的
Commercial television and radio are paid for by the broadcasting of advertisements, rather than by the government.





...Classic FM, the first national commercial radio station.


国内首家商业广播电台——经典调频





6


ADJ-GRADED
(电影或音乐)商业化的，迎合大众口味的
Commercial is used to describe something such as a film or a type of music that it is intended to be popular with the public, and is not very original or of high quality.





There's a feeling among a lot of people that music has become too commercial.


很多人都觉得音乐变得过于商业化了。





7


N-COUNT
(电视或电台的)商业广告
A commercial is an advertisement that is broadcast on television or radio.





The government has launched a campaign of television commercials and leaflets.


政府通过电视广告和传单的形式发起了宣传活动。







  牛津词典 金山词霸客户端产品已经全面收录牛津词典       牛津词典免费送   点击下载    词霸Android版  牛津词典免费使用! 立刻扫码下载   词霸iOS版  牛津词典免费使用! 立刻扫码下载       词根词缀 词组搭配        {{item.type}}: {{item.type_value}} {{item.type_exp}}                           常用词组                                同义词 同义词解析 反义词                                                                                 英英词典 英汉双向大词典                                                   释义相关词条：                                    汉语词典           繁体  笔画  造字法    首部  五笔  结构         释义      构成    例句    同义词    反义词         释义    例句      同义词    反义词                           网络释义       常用词组              相关词条                  行业词典                     百科             查看更多  本内容来源于            查看更多  本内容来源于              今日热词 热门搜索         你好   海龟   allude   海归   空气污染   regularly   志愿者   tendency   test   explicitly        阅卷笔录   孙中山   宋慧乔   家庭软暴力   海警   duck feather   天下第一泉   ecotour   干菜类   我是特种兵         创建新的生词本     i该生词本已经创建啦!  i不可以出现中文，英文，数字之外的符号哒!  i生词本名称长度不能大于24字符!  i请填写生词本名称!  取消 创建         每日一句                       精彩推荐               爱词霸查词为您提供在线翻译、英语翻译、英文翻译、英译汉、汉译英、fanyi等权威在线翻译服务！  京ICP证100054号    新出网证<京>字011号 京网文【2014】0937-238号 京ICP备06025896号 京公网安备        一键安装词霸桌面版，释义更精准，速度快三倍！ 点击下载      


Difference Between Industrial and Commercial



































 

















Difference BetweenDifference Between Things, Terms and Objects 





Home / Technology / Civil Engineering / Construction / Difference Between Industrial and CommercialDifference Between Industrial and Commercial
Posted on April 11, 2011 by koshal  Last updated on: January 16, 2015








  Industrial vs Commercial 
  
To understand the difference between industrial and commercial, one should simply look at how these two terms are used in the English language. These two words are used with different senses. For example, there is industrial property as well as commercial property. At the same time, in the sense of business, there is industrial sector as well as commercial sector. When we think about commercial, we associate the term normally with profit. Then, when we think about industrial, we normally associate that term with the production process. Since production process and profit go hand in hand one might think both industrial and commercial mean the same. That, however, is a false assumption. Though the terms have meanings that are somewhat connected, that does not mean they are the same. Therefore, in this article we will explore what industrial and commercial stand for.
What does Industrial mean?
The word industrial is the adjective of the noun industry. So the meaning of the word industrial, according to the American Heritage Dictionary is ‘of, relating to, or resulting from the manufacturing industry.’ For example, industrial noise (this is a result of industry) and industrial expansion (this is something related to industry).
With this main definition of the term industrial, you may have guessed the meaning of the term industrial sector. An industrial sector consists of businesses that are engaged in producing or manufacturing items.
Industrial property
Then, there is also industrial property. Industrial property is used for industrial purposes. In other words, an industrial property is used for manufacturing purposes. For example, a factory is an industrial property since it is the place where some product is manufactured. These properties are usually situated in the outskirts of the city. They do not have much of an appearance as they do not have to face much of a crowd on a daily basis.





What does Commercial mean?
The word commercial is the adjective of the noun commerce. So, naturally commercial has the meaning of something related to commerce. For example, commercial agreement, commercial loan, etc.
Then, we come to the term commercial sector. Commercial sector consists of businesses in that people engage in with the aim of earning a profit. In such a business, different methods are followed in order to earn profit. For example, products can be prepared in large quantities so that they can be distributed among a large number of customers. Such products are known as commercial products. An example of a commercial product is mobile phones. They are produced in large numbers. They contain a number of features that ensure they will be sold without causing a profit loss to the company.
Commercial property
Commercial property is used to sell the goods that are manufactured in industrial properties. So, commercial property is much more attractive as they should attract customers. Commercial property is usually situated in the heart of a city.
What is the difference between Industrial and Commercial?
• Industrial means something that relates to the manufacturing industry. It can also mean something that is the result of manufacturing industry. Commercial means something related to commerce.
• Industrial sector consists of businesses that are engaged in producing or manufacturing items. Commercial sector consists of businesses in that people engage in with the aim of earning a profit.
• Industrial property is used for industrial purposes. In other words, an industrial property is used for manufacturing purposes. Commercial property is used to sell the goods that are manufactured in industrial properties.
• Industrial property is less expensive than commercial property.
 
Images Courtesy:

Industrial land by GeographBot (CC BY-SA 2.0)
Commercial land by Gareth Edwards (CC BY-SA 3.0)







Related posts:


Difference Between Steel and Fibreglass Doors

Difference Between Conservatory and Orangery

Difference Between Easements and Rights of Way

Difference Between Ceramic and Porcelain Tile

Difference Between Black Pipe and Galvanized Pipe




Help us to improve our writing. Please Rate.  (No Ratings Yet)
Loading... 
Cite This Page
   "Difference Between Industrial and Commercial." DifferenceBetween.Com. April 11, 2011. < http://www.differencebetween.com/difference-between-industrial-and-vs-commercial/ >
   


Leave a Reply Cancel reply





 

Featured Topics
Difference Between W2 W4 and W9Difference Between ITIN and SSNDifference Between Scareware and Ransomware
 





 Latest Posts


Difference Between Sickle Cell Anemia and Thalassemia


Difference Between Sickle Cell Disease and Sickle Cell Anemia


Difference Between Prions and Viroids


Difference Between Aneurysm and Blood Clot


Difference Between Annual Leave and Holiday Pay


Difference Between Solid and Liquid Media

























Construction | Difference Between




























 

















Difference BetweenDifference Between Things, Terms and Objects 





Home / Technology / Civil Engineering / ConstructionDifference Between Caesarstone and Quartz
Key Difference  – Caesarstone vs Quartz   Quartz is one of the most common and useful minerals found in the Earth’s surface. Engineered quartz is a special composite that is made from crushed quartz bound together by an adhesive. Caesarstone is a brand name of engineered quartz. Thus, the key difference between Caesarstone and quartz […]
Difference Between Caesarstone and Silestone
Key Difference – Caesarstone vs Silestone   Caesarstone and Silestone are two well-known brands of quartz countertops. Both of these brands are engineered quartz – a manmade product that uses a mixture of natural quartz and resins, which are primarily used to design countertops. Engineered quartz is much more resistant to heat, stains, cracks, and […]
Difference Between Mortar and Grout
Mortar vs Grout   Grout and mortar are words used commonly in masonry. These are products that are used by a mason during construction of floors and walls. These are similar products with similar ingredients confusing many people who think them to be same or interchangeable products. However, despite overlap, there is a difference between […]
Difference Between Mortar and Concrete
Mortar vs Concrete   Mortar and concrete are two of the most common products used in the construction industry. Whether it is constructing a wall or laying a runway at an airport, products made by cement are used. While concrete is another name for strength and durability, mortar is indispensable because of its ability to […]
Difference Between Bamboo Flooring and Hardwood
Bamboo Flooring vs Hardwood   When it comes to building one’s dream house, many issues arise. One must choose the best products that suit one’s needs, requirements, and desires best and this is not an easy task. Flooring is one aspect of housing that seems to be particularly difficult. Bamboo flooring and hardwood flooring are […]
Difference Between Laminate and Wood Flooring
Laminate vs Wood Flooring   Building a house is not easy. There are so many aspects to look into; from walls, bathroom fittings to furniture, everything must be perfect. Flooring is one such important aspect that needs exquisite care when it comes to constructing a house. Laminate flooring and wood flooring are two such important […]
Difference Between Soffit and Fascia
Soffit vs Fascia   Fascia and soffit are two integral components that are used when it comes to installing roofing. Soffit and fascia provide a variety of purposes such as preventing mold and mildew as well as providing better ventilation. Although, fascia and soffit are two terms often used together they are two different things with different […]
Difference Between Asphalt and Blacktop
Asphalt vs Blacktop   When it comes to material that are commonly used for the construction of roads, asphalt and blacktop are two terms that are used very frequently. Often these two names are used interchangeably, but there is a minute difference between the two that set them apart. What is Asphalt? Asphalt concrete or […]
Difference Between Tarmac Asphalt and Bitumen
Tarmac Asphalt vs Bitumen   Three extremely popular construction materials used worldwide, asphalt, bitumen and tarmac are indeed quite hard to differentiate from one another to the untrained eye. However, the nature of these three materials vary drastically, thereby making it very necessary to discern them from one another. What is Asphalt? Asphalt or asphalt […]
Difference Between Asphalt and Concrete
Asphalt vs Concrete   Asphalt and concrete, two construction materials that are frequently used in the world over, are two different choices of paving that can easily be confused with each other. However, each material has a unique quality of its own which renders each of them significant advantages and disadvantages that must be considered […]
1
2
3
…
5
Next Page »

 

Featured Posts
Difference Between W2 W4 and W9Difference Between ITIN and SSNDifference Between Scareware and Ransomware
 





 Latest Posts


Difference Between Prions and Viroids


Difference Between Aneurysm and Blood Clot


Difference Between Annual Leave and Holiday Pay


Difference Between Solid and Liquid Media


Difference Between W2 W4 and W9


Difference Between ITIN and SSN


Difference Between Plant Hormones and Plant Growth Regulators


Difference Between Ipsy and Boxycharm


Difference Between Leotard and Bodysuit


Difference Between Unitard and Leotard




















Industry - Wikipedia






















 






Industry

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about industry in relation to economics. For other uses, see Industry (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs attention from an expert in Economics. The specific problem is: The article should be split according to different meanings of the word "industry". See the talk page for details. WikiProject Economics may be able to help recruit an expert. (December 2015)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)






GDP composition of sector and labour force by occupation in the form of any component to economy. The green, red, and blue components of the colours of the countries represent the percentages for the agriculture, industry, and services sectors, respectively.


Industry is the production of goods or related services within an economy.[1] The major source of revenue of a group or company is the indicator of its relevant industry.[2] When a large group has multiple sources of revenue generation, it is considered to be working in different industries. Manufacturing industry became a key sector of production and labour in European and North American countries during the Industrial Revolution, upsetting previous mercantile and feudal economies. This came through many successive rapid advances in technology, such as the production of steel and coal.
Following the Industrial Revolution, possibly a third of the world's economic output are derived that is from manufacturing industries. Many developed countries and many developing/semi-developed countries (People's Republic of China, India etc.) depend significantly on manufacturing industry. Industries, the countries they reside in, and the economies of those countries are interlinked in a complex web of interdependence.



Contents


1 Classification

1.1 ISIC


2 Industrial development
3 Deindustrialisation
4 Society
5 Industrial labour
6 War
7 List of countries by industrial output
8 See also
9 References
10 Bibliography
11 External links



Classification[edit]
Main articles: Economic sector and Industry classification
Industries can be classified in a variety of ways. At the top level, industry is often classified according to the three-sector theory into sectors: primary (extractive), secondary (manufacturing), and tertiary (services). Some authors add quaternary (knowledge) or even quinary (culture and research) sectors. Over time, the fraction of a society's industry within each sector changes.
Below the economic sectors there are many other more detailed industry classifications. These classification systems commonly divide industries according to similar functions and markets and identify businesses producing related products.
Industries can also be identified by product, such as: construction industry, chemical industry, petroleum industry, automotive industry, electronic industry, power engineering and power manufacturing (such as gas or wind turbines), meatpacking industry, hospitality industry, food industry, fish industry, software industry, paper industry, entertainment industry, semiconductor industry, cultural industry, and poverty industry.
Market-based classification systems such as the Global Industry Classification Standard and the Industry Classification Benchmark are used in finance and market research.
ISIC[edit]
Main article: International Standard Industrial Classification
The International Standard Industrial Classification (ISIC) of all economic activities is the most complete and systematic industrial classification made by the United Nations Statistics Division.[3]
ISIC is a standard classification of economic activities arranged so that entities can be classified according to the activity they carry out. The categories of ISIC at the most detailed level (classes) are delineated according to what is, in most countries, the customary combination of activities described in statistical units, considering the relative importance of the activities included in these classes.
While ISIC Rev.4 continues to use criteria such as input, output and use of the products produced, more emphasis has been given to the character of the production process in defining and delineating ISIC classes.
Industrial development[edit]




Optimized logistics have enabled the rapid development of industry. Here is a thermal oxidizer during the industrial shipping process.






A factory, a traditional symbol of the industrial development (a cement factory in Kunda, Estonia)


The Industrial Revolution led to the development of factories for large-scale production, with consequent changes in society.[4] Originally the factories were steam-powered, but later transitioned to electricity once an electrical grid was developed. The mechanized assembly line was introduced to assemble parts in a repeatable fashion, with individual workers performing specific steps during the process. This led to significant increases in efficiency, lowering the cost of the end process. Later automation was increasingly used to replace human operators. This process has accelerated with the development of the computer and the robot.
Deindustrialisation[edit]
Main article: Deindustrialisation




Colin Clark's sector model of an economy undergoing technological change. In later stages, the Quaternary sector of the economy grows.


Historically certain manufacturing industries have gone into a decline due to various economic factors, including the development of replacement technology or the loss of competitive advantage. An example of the former is the decline in carriage manufacturing when the automobile was mass-produced.
A recent trend has been the migration of prosperous, industrialized nations towards a post-industrial society. This is manifested by an increase in the service sector at the expense of manufacturing, and the development of an information-based economy, the so-called informational revolution. In a post-industrial society, manufacturers relocate to more profitable locations through a process of off-shoring.
Measurements of manufacturing industries outputs and economic effect are not historically stable. Traditionally, success has been measured in the number of jobs created. The reduced number of employees in the manufacturing sector has been assumed to result from a decline in the competitiveness of the sector, or the introduction of the lean manufacturing process.
Related to this change is the upgrading of the quality of the product being manufactured. While it is possible to produce a low-technology product with low-skill labour, the ability to manufacture high-technology products well is dependent on a highly skilled staff.
Society[edit]
Main article: Industrial society
An industrial society can be defined in many ways. Today, industry is an important part of most societies and nations. A government must have some kind of industrial policy, regulating industrial placement, industrial pollution, financing and industrial labour.
Industrial labour[edit]




A female industrial worker amidst heavy steel semi-products (KINEX BEARINGS, Bytča, Slovakia, c. 1995–2000)


Main article: Industrial labour
Further information: industrial sociology, industrial and organizational psychology, industrial district, and industrial park
In an industrial society, industry employs a major part of the population. This occurs typically in the manufacturing sector. A labour union is an organization of workers who have banded together to achieve common goals in key areas such as wages, hours, and other working conditions. The trade union, through its leadership, bargains with the employer on behalf of union members (rank and file members) and negotiates labour contracts with employers. This movement first rose among industrial workers.
War[edit]




The assembly plant of the Bell Aircraft Corporation (Wheatfield, New York, United States, 1944) producing P-39 Airacobra fighters


Main article: Industrial warfare
The Industrial Revolution changed warfare, with mass-produced weaponry and supplies, machine-powered transportation, mobilization, the total war concept and weapons of mass destruction. Early instances of industrial warfare were the Crimean War and the American Civil War, but its full potential showed during the world wars. See also military-industrial complex, arms industry, military industry and modern warfare.
List of countries by industrial output[edit]
Main article: List of countries by GDP sector composition

Largest countries by industrial output according to IMF and CIA World Factbook, 2016

Economy

Countries by industrial output in 2016 (billions in USD)



(01)  China



4,566



(—)  European Union



4,184



(02)  United States



3,602



(03)  Japan



1,368



(04)  Germany



1,050



(05)  India



672



(06)  South Korea



531



(07)  United Kingdom



505



(08)  France



478



(09)  Italy



442



(10)  Russia



424



(11)  Canada



424



(12)  Brazil



392



(13)  Indonesia



376



(14)  Australia



355



(15)  Mexico



346



(16)  Spain



312



(17)  Saudi Arabia



276



(18)  Turkey



232



(19)  Taiwan



191



(20)  Poland



180




The twenty largest countries by industrial output in 2016, according to the IMF and CIA World Factbook.



See also[edit]

North American Industry Classification System
North American Product Classification System
Standard Industrial Classification
Industry information
Industrial Revolution
Outline of industry

References[edit]



^ Industry | Define Industry at Dictionary.com Archived 2014-02-04 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "'Definition of Industry' Investopedia". Archived from the original on 2017-07-24. 
^ ISIC (Rev.4)
^ More, Charles (2000). "Understanding the Industrial Revolution". London: Routledge. Archived from the original on 2011-08-14. 



Bibliography[edit]

Krahn, Harvey J., and Graham S. Lowe. Work, Industry, and Canadian Society. Second ed. Scarborough, Ont.: Nelson Canada, 1993. xii, 430 p. ISBN 0-17-603540-0

External links[edit]

 The dictionary definition of industry at Wiktionary
 Media related to Industries at Wikimedia Commons
 Quotations related to industry at Wikiquote







v
t
e


Major industries






Heavy
Light








Activism
Advertising
Aerospace

Space


Aircraft

Aircraft tire


Agriculture

Flowers
Horticulture
Coffee


Audiovisual
Alcohol
Anime
Arms
Automotive
Bicycle
Biotechnology
Chemical
Computer
Construction

Dredging


Content
Creative
Cultural
Education
Electric power
Electronics

Semiconductor


Energy

Renewable energy


Entertainment
Fashion
Film
Financial services

Insurance industry


Fishing
Food

Bushfood


Fur
Gaming

Online gambling


Health care
Hospitality
Information
Language
Leisure
Manufacturing
Meat industry

Meat packing


Mineral
Motorsport
Music
Naval stores
Payment card
Personal care
Petroleum

Oil shale


Pharmaceutical
Plastics
Poverty
Professional services
Pulp and paper
Radio
Real estate

Housing


Online service
Security
Sex
Shipbuilding
Software
Sport
Textile
Tobacco
Tourism
Video game
Water












v
t
e


Technology






Outline of technology
Outline of applied science





Fields




Agriculture



Agricultural engineering
Aquaculture
Fisheries science
Food chemistry
Food engineering
Food microbiology
Food technology
GURT
ICT
Nutrition





Biomedical



Bioinformatics
Biological engineering
Biomechatronics
Biomedical engineering
Biotechnology
Cheminformatics
Genetic engineering
Healthcare science
Medical research
Medical technology
Nanomedicine
Neuroscience
Neurotechnology
Pharmacology
Reproductive technology
Tissue engineering





Buildings and
construction



Acoustical engineering
Architectural engineering
Building services engineering
Civil engineering
Construction engineering
Domestic technology
Facade engineering
Fire protection engineering
Safety engineering
Sanitary engineering
Structural engineering





Educational



Educational software
Digital technologies in education
ICT in education
Impact
Multimedia learning
Virtual campus
Virtual education





Energy



Nuclear engineering
Nuclear technology
Petroleum engineering
Soft energy technology





Environmental



Clean technology
Clean coal technology
Ecological design
Ecological engineering
Ecotechnology
Environmental engineering
Environmental engineering science
Green building
Green nanotechnology
Landscape engineering
Renewable energy
Sustainable design
Sustainable engineering





Industrial



Automation
Business informatics
Engineering management
Enterprise engineering
Financial engineering
Industrial biotechnology
Industrial engineering
Metallurgy
Mining engineering
Productivity improving technologies
Research and development
Tribology





IT and
communications



Artificial intelligence
Broadcast engineering
Computer engineering
Computer science
Financial technology
Information technology
Music technology
Ontology engineering
RF engineering
Software engineering
Telecommunications engineering
Visual technology
Web engineering





Military



Army engineering maintenance
Electronic warfare
Military communications
Military engineering
Stealth technology





Transport



Aerospace engineering
Automotive engineering
Naval architecture
Space technology
Traffic engineering
Transport engineering









Others




Applied
science



Cryogenics
Electro-optics
Electronics
Engineering geology
Engineering physics
Hydraulics
Materials science
Microfabrication
Nanoengineering





Engineering
(list)



Audio
Biochemical
Ceramic
Chemical
Polymer
Control
Electrical
Electronic
Entertainment
Geotechnical
Hydraulic
Mechanical
Mechatronics
Optical
Protein
Quantum
Robotics

Animatronics


Systems














Components



Infrastructure
Invention

Timeline


Knowledge
Machine
Skill

Craft


Tool

Gadget







Scales



Femtotechnology
Picotechnology
Nanotechnology
Microtechnology
Macro-engineering
Megascale engineering





History



Prehistoric technology
Neolithic Revolution
Ancient technology
Medieval technology
Renaissance technology
Industrial Revolution

Second


Atomic Age
Jet Age
Space Age
Digital Revolution
Information Age





Theories and
concepts



Appropriate technology
Collingridge dilemma
Critique of technology
Diffusion of innovations
Disruptive innovation
Dual-use technology
Ephemeralization
High tech
Hype cycle
Low-technology
Mature technology
Strategy of Technology
Technicism
Techno-progressivism
Technocapitalism
Technocentrism
Technocracy
Technocriticism
Technoculture
Technoethics
Technoetic
Technogaianism
Technoliberalism
Technolibertarianism
Technological alliance
Technological apartheid
Technological change
Technological convergence
Technological determinism
Technological escalation
Technological evolution
Technological fix
Technological innovation system
Technological momentum
Technological nationalism
Technological paradigm
Technological rationality
Technological revival
Technological revolution
Technological self-efficacy
Technological singularity

Singularitarianism


Technological somnambulism
Technological transitions
Technological unemployment
Technological utopianism
Technology lifecycle

Technology acceptance model
Technology adoption lifecycle


Technomancy
Technopaganism
Technorealism
Technoromanticism
Technoscience

feminist


Transhumanism





Other



Emerging technologies

List


Fictional technology
High-technology business districts
Kardashev scale
List of technologies
Philosophy of technology

Ethics of technology


Science, technology and society

Technology dynamics
Science and technology by country


STEM fields

Pre-STEM
women


STEAM fields
Technology alignment
Technology assessment
Technology brokering
Technology companies
Technology demonstration
Technology education

Technical universities and colleges


Technology evangelist
Technology fusion
Technology governance
Technology integration
Technology journalism
Technology management
Technology museum
Technology policy
Technology shock
Technology strategy
Technology and society
Technology transfer
Technophilia
Technophobia
Technoself
Technosexual
Technosignature
Technostress
Terotechnology








 Book
 Category
 Portal








Business and economics portal





Authority control



GND: 4026779-9
NDL: 00570111










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Industry&oldid=792132353"					
Categories: IndustryHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksUse British English Oxford spelling from September 2016Articles needing additional references from February 2009All articles needing additional referencesArticles needing expert attention from December 2015All articles needing expert attentionEconomics articles needing expert attentionWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansAlemannischАҧсшәаالعربيةAragonésঅসমীয়াAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБашҡортсаБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegБуряадCatalàЧӑвашлаCebuanoČeštinaChiShonaCorsuCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFiji HindiFrançaisFryskFurlanGaeilgeGalego한국어हिन्दीHrvatskiIdoIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaKalaallisutಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიKaszëbscziҚазақшаKiswahiliKreyòl ayisyenKurdîЛезгиລາວلۊری شومالیLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųLimburgsMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംमराठीمصرىمازِرونیBahasa MelayuMirandésМонголမြန်မာဘာသာNederlandsनेपालीनेपाल भाषा日本語НохчийнNordfriiskNorsk bokmålNorsk nynorskNovialOccitanОлык марийOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀپنجابیپښتوPatoisPiemontèisPlattdüütschPolskiPortuguêsRomânăRuna SimiРусиньскыйРусскийСаха тылаScotsShqipSicilianuSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaSoomaaligaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaతెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوVènetoVepsän kel’Tiếng ViệtVõroWinarayWolofXitsongaייִדישYorùbá粵語ZazakiŽemaitėška中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 17:26.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Best practice - Wikipedia





















 






Best practice

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

A best practice is a method or technique that has been generally accepted as superior to any alternatives because it produces results that are superior to those achieved by other means or because it has become a standard way of doing things, e.g., a standard way of complying with legal or ethical requirements.
Best practices are used to maintain quality as an alternative to mandatory legislated standards and can be based on self-assessment or benchmarking.[1] Best practice is a feature of accredited management standards such as ISO 9000 and ISO 14001.[2]
Some consulting firms specialize in the area of best practice and offer pre-made 'templates' to standardize business process documentation. Sometimes a "best practice" is not applicable or is inappropriate for a particular organization's needs. A key strategic talent required when applying best practice to organizations is the ability to balance the unique qualities of an organization with the practices that it has in common with others.
Good operating practice is a strategic management term. More specific uses of the term include good agricultural practices, good manufacturing practice, good laboratory practice, good clinical practice and good distribution practice.



Contents


1 In public policy

1.1 Develop realistic expectations
1.2 Analyze smart practices
1.3 Observe the practice
1.4 Describe generic vulnerabilities
1.5 But will it work here?
1.6 Back to the eightfold path
1.7 Methodology according to Bretschneider et al.
1.8 Examples


2 Use in health and human services
3 In action

3.1 Clean air financing programs
3.2 Environmental management
3.3 Higher education
3.4 Health and human services
3.5 Charity / nonprofit sector


4 Other domains
5 Critique
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



In public policy[edit]





This article does not cite any sources. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (September 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Best practice is a form of program evaluation in public policy. It is the process of reviewing policy alternatives that have been effective in addressing similar issues in the past and could be applied to a current problem. Determining "Best" or "Smart" Practices to address a particular policy problem is a commonly used but little understood tool of analysis because the concept is vague and should therefore be examined with caution. Vagueness stems from the term "best" which is subjective. While some research and evidence must go into determining a practice the "best" it is more helpful to simply determine if a practice has worked exceptionally well and why. Instead of it being "the best", a practice might simply be a smart practice, a good practice, or a promising practice. This allows for a mix and match approach for making recommendations that might encompass pieces of many good practices.
Eugene Bardach provides the following theoretical framework in his book A Practical Guide for Policy Analysis, Eightfold Path (policy analysis) for "best" or "smart" practices:
Develop realistic expectations[edit]
Bardach advises the policy analyst to maintain realistic expectations when seeking a "best practice" in public policy analysis, because the practice may not be solving the problem at all and it may instead produce unfavorable results. Because a practice seems to be tailored to a specific policy problem and also based on solid research, it does not necessarily mean it is creating good results. However the research can produce thought-provoking concepts on what can and can not work when put into practice.
Analyze smart practices[edit]
In policy analysis a "best" or "smart" practice is a clear and concrete behavior that solves a problem or achieves a goal. Smart practices take “advantage” of an idle opportunity at a low cost and little risk. Eugene Bardach refers to this as finding the free lunches. These are opportunities for creative policy improvements such as "cost-based pricing" or "input substitution" that have the possibility to generate public value at a very low cost. Breaking loose from conventions and challenging assumptions can also be way to take advantage of an idle opportunity. An example of this is the highly controversial practice of the government contracting out a community good or service to nonprofits or the private sector. This challenges the assumption that a community good or service must be financed through taxation and delivered by government employees.
Observe the practice[edit]
The primary mechanism in a "smart" practice is the ability or the means of achieving a goal in a cost-effective manner. The secondary mechanisms include implementing features, supportive features and optional features. It can be very complicated to separate between the functions in getting the mechanism to work and the features that support those functions.
Bardach recommends when adapting smart practices for another source, it is important to identify the core essence of the practice while allowing flexibility for how it is implemented so it remains sensitive to local conditions. Robust smart practices are adaptable to various conditions, have many operational features, and can employ similar but diverse ways to achieve their goals.
Describe generic vulnerabilities[edit]
In addition to the reasons why a smart practice might succeed, an analyst should describe potential vulnerabilities that could lead a smart practice to fail—these weaknesses are "generic vulnerabilities”. Two types of vulnerabilities are worth particular attention: 1) poor general management capacity, which makes it more difficult to effectively implement a smart practice, and 2) weaknesses inherent to the practice itself. Policymakers must develop safeguards in order to minimize the risk of generic vulnerabilities.
But will it work here?[edit]
The final step in identifying an appropriate "best practice" for a policy problem is to ensure that the context from which the practice is derived is comparable to the context in which it will be applied. Risks to implementing the selected "best practice" in the applied context as well as what support structures can be put in place need to be anticipated in order to maximize the likelihood of success. If utilizing a pilot or demonstration program "best practice" the success of that practice needs to be discounted in order to account for the better than average favorable conditions pilot and demonstration programs usually operate under. These conditions include increased enthusiasm, advantageous political and economic conditions, and less bureaucratic resistance due to the lack of permanency in pilot programs. Finally, when considering implementing a "best practice" on a wide scale one must be aware of the 'weakest link' sites with minimal to no resources and how those sites will be supported in order to create the desired policy outcomes.
Back to the eightfold path[edit]
Excessive optimism about the expected impact of untested smart practices is a common critique. If a current practice is known to be ineffective, implementing a promising alternative after weighing the alternatives may be worth the risk.[3]
Methodology according to Bretschneider et al.[edit]
Bretschneider et al.[4] offers an alternate methodology for Best Practices research . Bretschneider's approach is much more technical than Bardach's, and explores issues of "completeness" and comparability. He addresses the fact that fully establishing whether a practice is truly a "best practice" would require assessment in all contexts, while in practice, only example cases are analyzed. Bretschneider also stresses the fact that in order for something to be considered a "best practice" it must be arrived at through a comparative process between methodologies. In order for a BPA (as defined by Bretschneider) to be valid, it must take into account all relevant approaches, since neglecting to do so would lead to inappropriate usage of the term "best." Comparing sample practices may yield a "good" practice, but may also be altogether unreliable, depending on how the sample was selected.
Examples[edit]
There are many examples of the use of "best"/"smart" practice evaluations in Public Policy.
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) produces a document called The Clean Energy-Environment Guide to Action.[5] It is designed to share successful state "best practices" to determine what is most suitable for them to use in generating clean energy policies and programs. The guide includes 16 clean energy policies and programs that offer opportunities for states to save energy, improve air quality, lower greenhouse gas emission and increase economic development.
An example of a successful "best practice" from the guide is "Building Codes for Energy Efficiency". This practice is to use building energy codes to set requirements that establish a minimum level of energy efficiency standards for residential and commercial buildings. California Energy Code Title 24 is one "best practice" that is highlighted in this guide. The following points for energy code implementation is to educate and train key audiences, supply the right resources, and to provide budget and staff for the program.
Eugene Bardach has a list of "smart" practice candidates in his book A Practical Guide for Policy Analysis, Eightfold Path (policy analysis). One example is the tutoring program for children in grades 1-3 called Reading One-to-One. The program from Texas includes one on one tutoring with supervision and simple structured instruction in phonemic awareness. Phonemic awareness is one highly regarded predictor of how well a child will learn to read in the first two years of school.[6] The program takes advantage of the fact that many children, especially ESL students, fail in reading because it is very hard for second language students to understand and pronounce sounds in English. The program is easily duplicated at a relatively low cost because of the straight forward teaching materials, systematic methods and administrative oversight.
In September 2013 at the New York State Conference for Mayors and Municipal Officials,[7] successes, ideas and information on "best" practices were shared among government peers. A "best" practice that was highlighted at the conference was how Salinas, California is rebuilding their economy by engaging technology companies with their agricultural business in order to grow jobs.[8] Salinas is taking advantage of an idle opportunity. The area already has abundant lettuce fields and now the city is marketing itself as a lab for agricultural technology. This public/private partnership includes a new nonprofit called the Steinbeck Innovation Foundation to increase investment in new technologies to help the area's agricultural industry.
Use in health and human services[edit]
In recent years, public agencies and non-governmental organizations have been exploring and adopting best practices when delivering health and human services. In these settings, the use of the terms "promising practices", "best practices", and "evidence-based practices" is common and often confusing as there is not a general consensus on what constitutes promising practices or best practices. In this context, the use of the terms "best practices" and "evidence-based practices" are often used interchangeably. Evidence-based practices are methods or techniques that have documented outcomes and ability to replicate as key factors.
Despite these challenges, literature suggests that there is some common use of and criteria for identifying best practices. For example, a general working definition used by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) in referring to a promising practice is defined as one with at least preliminary evidence of effectiveness in small-scale interventions or for which there is potential for generating data that will be useful for making decisions about taking the intervention to scale and generalizing the results to diverse populations and settings.[9]
Since evidence of effectiveness, potential for taking the intervention to scale and generalizing the results to other populations and settings are key factors for best practices, the manner in which a method or intervention becomes a best practice can take some time and effort. The table below demonstrates the process for a promising practice to achieve the status of research validated best practice.[10]


Research Validated Best Practice
A program, activity or strategy that has the highest degree of proven effectiveness supported by objective and comprehensive research and evaluation.


Field Tested Best Practice
A program, activity or strategy that has been shown to work effectively and produce successful outcomes and is supported to some degree by subjective and objective data sources.


Promising Practice
A program, activity or strategy that has worked within one organization and shows promise during its early stages for becoming a best practice with long term sustainable impact. A promising practice must have some objective basis for claiming effectiveness and must have the potential for replication among other organizations.


The National Registry of Evidence-Based Programs and Practices (NREPP) (External Link: http://nrepp.samhsa.gov) is a searchable online registry of interventions supporting substance abuse prevention and mental health treatment that have been reviewed and rated by independent reviewers. NREPP accepts submissions for interventions that meet minimum requirements to be considered for review. Minimum requirements include (1) demonstration of one or more positive outcomes among individuals, communities, or populations; (2) evidence of these outcomes has been demonstrated in at least one study using an experimental or quasi-experimental design; (3) the results of these studies have been published in a peer-reviewed journal or other professional publication, or documented in a comprehensive evaluation report; and (4) implementation materials, training and support resources, and quality assurance procedures have been developed and are ready for use by the public. NREPP is not an exhaustive list of interventions and inclusion in the registry does not constitute an endorsement. (Reference: National Registry of Evidence-Based Programs and Practices. Federal Register/Vol. 76, No. 180/Friday, September 16, 2011/Notices)
There is existing controversy about the lack of culturally appropriate evidence-based best practices and the need to utilize a research-based approach to validate interventions. Some communities have deployed practices over a long period of time that has produced positive outcomes as well as a general community consensus to be successful. The California Reducing Disparities Project (CRDP) is working to identify such practices. (External Link: https://web.archive.org/web/20111220092834/http://www.dmh.ca.gov/Multicultural_Services/CRDP.asp) CRDP intends to improve access, quality of care, and increase positive outcomes for racial, ethnic and cultural communities. These communities have been identified as (1) African American, (2) Asian/Pacific Islanders, (3) Latinos, (4) Lesbian, Gay, Bi-sexual, Transgender, Questioning, and (5) Native Americans. Strategic Planning Workgroups composed of mental health providers and community members as well as consumers and family members are given the task of identifying new approaches toward reducing disparities. The five Strategic Planning Workgroups work to identify new service delivery approaches defined by multicultural communities for multicultural communities using community-defined evidence to improve outcomes and reduce disparities. Community- defined evidence is defined as “a set of practices that communities have used and determined to yield positive results as determined by community consensus over time and which may or may not have been measured empirically but have reached a level of acceptance by the community.” (Reference: National Latina/o Psychological Association, Fall/Winter 2008, National Network to Eliminate Disparities in Behavioral Health, SAMHSA, and CMHS, Larke Nahme Huang, Ph.D)
In action[edit]
Clean air financing programs[edit]
Financing Clean Air Programs, and example taken from NGA[11]
This is a quick guide put together by the NGA Center for Best Practices. It explores what clean air programs currently exist and how they are being financed. Rather than stating one best practice to tackling clean air, this report creates a table of the different programs, how they are being financed, and in what state. Governors and their staffs can then look for characteristics and solutions that are most realistic and applicable to their situation. The key is to tailor current practices that are in the world to the specific situation you are looking to solve. Best practices are meant to give insight into existing strategies.
Environmental management[edit]
See also: Best management practice for water pollution
The concept of best practice has been employed extensively in environmental management. For example, it has been employed in aquaculture such as recommending low-phosphorus feed ingredients,[12] in forestry to manage riparian buffer zones,[13] in livestock and pasture management to regulate stocking rates,[14] and in particular, best management practices have been important to improving water quality relating to nonpoint source pollution of fertilizers in agriculture[15] as well as the identification and adoption of best practice for controlling salinity.[16] However, in the context of complex environmental problems such as dryland salinity, there are significant challenges in defining what is best in any given context. Best management practice for complex problems is context specific and often contested against a background of imperfect knowledge. In these contexts, it is more useful to think of best management practice as an adaptive learning process rather than a fixed set of rules or guidelines. This approach to best practice focuses on fostering improvements in quality and promoting continuous learning.[17]
Higher education[edit]
STEM Program explanation is taken from Angela Baber's report to the NGA
The NGA has identified science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) as important skills that need to be developed in community colleges in order to create a strong work force. Many states are creating or have created STEM Programs to address this issue. In order for these programs to work governors should:

"Engage business to help ensure that community colleges meet regional STEM-skill needs
Use community colleges to support new models of STEM education
Reward community colleges and students for STEM course-completion
Ensure that community colleges support more effective mathematics remediation
Require that community college STEM credits and credentials are transferable."[18]

Health and human services[edit]
The U.S. Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF) makes evidence-based recommendations on clinical preventive services. The Task Force recommendations are based on systematic reviews and assessment of the available medical evidence.





This section needs to be updated. Please update this article to reflect recent events or newly available information. (June 2012)


The San Francisco Public Health Department[19] conducted The Transgender Best Practices Guide project, a best practices document for cultural and service competency in working with transgender clients within HIV/AIDS service- provision settings. Following an intensive literature search and consumer focus group, a Working Group composed of noted community leaders; activists, professionals, and transgender consumers participated in the development of the Best Practices guide. Topics covered by the Best Practices guide include mental health issues; gender identity; hormone use and clinical care practices. The Best Practices guide is currently in production; it will be published and distributed to EMA providers, as well as to select organizations nationwide. In addition, four large-scale EMA provider trainings will be provided to educate providers on the Best Practices recommendations and standard measures. This is the first national federally funded effort to develop a Best Practices guide for providers who serve the HIV positive transgender community.[20]
Charity / nonprofit sector[edit]
The nonprofit/voluntary sector is generally lacking tools for sharing and accessing best practices. Steps are being taken in some parts of the world, for example in the European Union, where the Europe 2020 Strategy has as a top priority the exchange of good practices and networking (including the nonprofit sector).[21]
An initiative of sharing good practices in terms of human resources (HR) and leadership among European nonprofit organizations was financed by the EU and launched in 2013, called HR Twinning.[22] The platform allows the public to search for good practices and its members the possibility to share their practices, engage in discussions in the forum section and enroll their organization. Membership is free. The project is currently limited to a European audience.
Other domains[edit]
Nearly every industry and professional discipline discusses best practices. Areas of note include information technology development (such as new software,) construction, transportation, business management, sustainable development and various aspects of project management. Best practices also occur in healthcare to deliver high-quality care that promotes best outcomes. Best practices are used within business areas including sales, manufacturing, teaching, computer programming, road construction, health care, insurance, telecommunication and public policy.
Critique[edit]
There are some criticisms of the term "best practice." Eugene Bardach claims that the work necessary to deem and practice the "best" is rarely done. Most of the time, one will find "good" practices or "smart" practices that offer insight into solutions that may or may not work for a given situation.[3]
Scott Ambler challenges the assumptions that there can be a recommended practice that is best in all cases. Instead, he offers an alternative view, "contextual practice," in which the notion of what is "best" will vary with the context.[23] Similarly, Cem Kaner and James Bach provide two scenarios to illustrate the contextual nature of "best practice" in their article.[24] In essence, such critiques are consistent with the contingency theory, which was developed during the 1950s and 1960s.
See also[edit]

Anti-pattern - a commonly followed standard or practice which is in fact far from the best solution
Benchmarking
Best available technology
Best coding practices
Best current practice in engineering and information technology


Best management practice for water pollution
Best of all possible worlds
Business rule
Good clinical data management practice
GxP
Not invented here - conscious rejection of best practices originating elsewhere
Pre-assessment
Reinventing the wheel - solving a problem from scratch without regard to previous solutions by others
Standard of Good Practice
Strategic management

References[edit]



^ Bogan, C.E. & English, M.J. (1994). Bench marking for Best Practices: Winning Through Innovative Adaptation. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
^ Nash, J. and Ehrenfeld, J., 1997: "Codes of environmental management practice: assessing their potential as a tool for change." Annual Review of Energy and the Environment 22, 487-535
^ a b Bardach, Eugene (2011). A Practical Guide for Policy Analysis: The Eightfold Path to More Effective Problem Solving. Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage. ISBN 9781608718429.
^ Bretschneider, S., Marc-Aurele, F.J., Jr., and Wu, J. (2005). "Best Practices" Research: A methodological guide for the perplexed, Journal of Public Administration Research and Theory (15)2:307-323.
^ "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 2012-07-13. Retrieved 2013-09-29. 
^ http://www.colorincolorado.org/article/33830/
^ http://www.nycom.org/
^ http://blogs.kqed.org/newsfix/2013/09/27/to-create-jobs-a-city-becomes-an-investor/
^ U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families Program Announcement, 2003.
^ U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families Program Announcement. Federal Register, Vol. 68, No. 131, July 2003.
^ "Clean Energy Financing". NGA Center for Best Practice. Archived from the original on 14 December 2011. Retrieved 22 September 2011. 
^ Macmillan, J.R., Huddleston, T., Woolley, M., and Fothergill, K., (2003) "Best management practice development to minimize environmental impact from large flow-through trout farms." Aquaculture 226, 91-99
^ Broadmeadow, S. and Nisbet, T.R., (2004) "The effects of riparian forest management on the freshwater environment: a literature review of best management practice." Hydrology and Earth System Sciences 8, 286-305
^ Brannan, K.M., Mostaghimi, S., McClellan, P.W. and Inamdar, S., 2000: "Animal waste BMP impacts on sediment and nutrient losses in runoff from the Owl Run Watershed." Transactions of the ASAE 43, 1155-1166
^ Gitau, M.W., Gburek, W.J., and Jarrett, A.R., (2005) "A tool for estimating best management practice effectiveness for phosphorus pollution control." Journal of Soil and Water Conservation 60, 1-10
^ Hooper, B.P., 1995: "Adoption of best management practices for dryland salinity: the need for an integrated environmental management approach." Report prepared for the Murray-Darling Basin Commission. Centre for Water Policy Research University of New England, Armidale, N.S.W.
^ Measham, T.G., Kelly, G.J. and Smith F.P. (2007) "Best Management Practice for complex problems: a case study of defining BMP for Dryland Salinity." Geographical Research 45 (3) pp. 262-272
^ Baber, Angela. "Using Community Colleges to Build a STEM-Skilled Workforce". NGA Center for Best Practices. Retrieved 22 September 2011. 
^ San Francisco Department of Public Health. Sfdph.org. Retrieved on 2013-07-12. Archived 2014-06-27 at the Wayback Machine.
^ San Francisco Department of Public Health, Annual Report 2005–2006
^ "Europe 2020 Civil Society". European Commission. Retrieved 19 June 2013. 
^ "Improving nonprofit leadership and HR practices". Asociatia Young Initiative. Retrieved 19 June 2013. 
^ Ambler, Scott. "Questioning "Best Practices" for Software Development". Retrieved 17 November 2011. 
^ Kaner, Cem. "The Seven Basic Principles of the Context-Driven School". Retrieved 17 November 2011. 





The National Governors Association Center for Best Practices. "NGA Center for Best Practice". Retrieved 2011-09-15.


External links[edit]

IETF Best Current Practice RFCs List - Internet Engineering Task Force





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Best_practice&oldid=791233888"					
Categories: ManagementSoftware development philosophiesQualityGood practiceHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksArticles lacking sources from September 2014All articles lacking sourcesWikipedia articles in need of updating from June 2012All Wikipedia articles in need of updating 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어हिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaItalianoMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk nynorskPortuguêsРусскийSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 July 2017, at 23:50.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Civil Engineering | Difference Between




























 

















Difference BetweenDifference Between Things, Terms and Objects 





Home / Technology / Civil EngineeringDifference Between Caesarstone and Quartz
Key Difference  – Caesarstone vs Quartz   Quartz is one of the most common and useful minerals found in the Earth’s surface. Engineered quartz is a special composite that is made from crushed quartz bound together by an adhesive. Caesarstone is a brand name of engineered quartz. Thus, the key difference between Caesarstone and quartz […]
Difference Between Caesarstone and Silestone
Key Difference – Caesarstone vs Silestone   Caesarstone and Silestone are two well-known brands of quartz countertops. Both of these brands are engineered quartz – a manmade product that uses a mixture of natural quartz and resins, which are primarily used to design countertops. Engineered quartz is much more resistant to heat, stains, cracks, and […]
Difference Between Mortar and Grout
Mortar vs Grout   Grout and mortar are words used commonly in masonry. These are products that are used by a mason during construction of floors and walls. These are similar products with similar ingredients confusing many people who think them to be same or interchangeable products. However, despite overlap, there is a difference between […]
Difference Between Mortar and Concrete
Mortar vs Concrete   Mortar and concrete are two of the most common products used in the construction industry. Whether it is constructing a wall or laying a runway at an airport, products made by cement are used. While concrete is another name for strength and durability, mortar is indispensable because of its ability to […]
Difference Between Bamboo Flooring and Hardwood
Bamboo Flooring vs Hardwood   When it comes to building one’s dream house, many issues arise. One must choose the best products that suit one’s needs, requirements, and desires best and this is not an easy task. Flooring is one aspect of housing that seems to be particularly difficult. Bamboo flooring and hardwood flooring are […]
Difference Between Laminate and Wood Flooring
Laminate vs Wood Flooring   Building a house is not easy. There are so many aspects to look into; from walls, bathroom fittings to furniture, everything must be perfect. Flooring is one such important aspect that needs exquisite care when it comes to constructing a house. Laminate flooring and wood flooring are two such important […]
Difference Between Soffit and Fascia
Soffit vs Fascia   Fascia and soffit are two integral components that are used when it comes to installing roofing. Soffit and fascia provide a variety of purposes such as preventing mold and mildew as well as providing better ventilation. Although, fascia and soffit are two terms often used together they are two different things with different […]
Difference Between Asphalt and Blacktop
Asphalt vs Blacktop   When it comes to material that are commonly used for the construction of roads, asphalt and blacktop are two terms that are used very frequently. Often these two names are used interchangeably, but there is a minute difference between the two that set them apart. What is Asphalt? Asphalt concrete or […]
Difference Between Tarmac Asphalt and Bitumen
Tarmac Asphalt vs Bitumen   Three extremely popular construction materials used worldwide, asphalt, bitumen and tarmac are indeed quite hard to differentiate from one another to the untrained eye. However, the nature of these three materials vary drastically, thereby making it very necessary to discern them from one another. What is Asphalt? Asphalt or asphalt […]
Difference Between Asphalt and Concrete
Asphalt vs Concrete   Asphalt and concrete, two construction materials that are frequently used in the world over, are two different choices of paving that can easily be confused with each other. However, each material has a unique quality of its own which renders each of them significant advantages and disadvantages that must be considered […]
1
2
3
…
6
Next Page »

 

Featured Posts
Difference Between W2 W4 and W9Difference Between ITIN and SSNDifference Between Scareware and Ransomware
 





 Latest Posts


Difference Between Prions and Viroids


Difference Between Aneurysm and Blood Clot


Difference Between Annual Leave and Holiday Pay


Difference Between Solid and Liquid Media


Difference Between W2 W4 and W9


Difference Between ITIN and SSN


Difference Between Plant Hormones and Plant Growth Regulators


Difference Between Ipsy and Boxycharm


Difference Between Leotard and Bodysuit


Difference Between Unitard and Leotard



















commercial general liability (CGL) policy - Insurance Glossary | IRMI.com













































Toggle navigation































IRMI Online
>

Glossary of Insurance & Risk Management Terms
>

Terms
>

C
>

commercial general liability (CGL) policy









×

 You are currently not signed in. Any products you have purchased will not be available until you
Sign In.


×
 For a personalized walk-through of IRMI Online, Request a Demo.



commercial general liability (CGL) policy
A standard insurance policy issued to business organizations to protect them
against liability claims for bodily injury (BI) and property damage (PD) arising out of
premises, operations, products, and completed operations; and advertising and
personal injury (PI) liability. The CGL policy was introduced in 1986 and replaced
the "comprehensive" general liability policy. See also
Casualty insurance;
Contractual liability
insurance; General liability insurance;
Insurance;
Product liability insurance.

Links for IRMI Online Subscribers Only:
CLI V.B




Suggest an improvement or addition to the Insurance and Risk Management Glossary


Buy a print version of the Insurance and Risk Management Glossary


Link to the Insurance and Risk Management Glossary









More Commercial Liability Information from IRMI




Books, Manuals, Newsletters


IRMI
Online


ReferenceConnect




Commercial Liability
Insurance










Commercial Auto Insurance










CGL Reporter










Pollution Coverage Issues










How To Draft and Interpret Insurance Policies










Insurance for Defective Construction










The Additional Insured Book










The Risk Report










The MCS-90 Book










Claims Operations: A Practical Guide










Free Insurance Articles in IRMI.com




25 Risk-Conquering Ideas




General Liability Insurance




Pollution Insurance




Additional Insured Insurance Law




Insurance Continuing Education Courses from IRMI




Additional Insured Issues (CE)




Commercial General Liability Insurance (CE)




Commercial Auto Insurance (CE)




Commercial Umbrella Liability Insurance (CE)




Ethics Considerations for P&C Insurance Professionals (CE)




Ethics in the P&C Insurance Workplace (CE)




Insurance for Small Businesses (CE)




Additional Insured Issues in Construction (CRIS CE)




Commercial Liability Insurance for Contractors (CRIS CE)















Prev



Next








© 2000-2017 International Risk Management Institute, Inc. (IRMI). All rights
reserved.
















Navigation


My IRMI Online


Conferences


Continuing Education


Certifications




Why IRMI?


About


Contact Us


Products


Help & Support


Terms of Use


Privacy


Sitemap


Social Media


















Popular Resources 


Product Catalog


Get Started


My IRMI Online


Insurance Glossary


Free Articles


Webinars


Free Content


Free Newsletters


What's New


Videos




Topics 


Commercial Liability


Commercial Property


Commercial Auto


Professional Liability


Workers Comp


Risk Management


Risk Finance & Captives


Construction


Personal Lines


Claims, Caselaw, Legal




Plans & Pricing 


Overview


Risk & Insurance Package


Coverage Analysis Package


Books Package


Betterley Reports Package


Insurance Law Essentials


Coverage Analysis Tools


Request Demo















All Products | GE.com

















































PRODUCT LIST

Appliances for BusinessAll Appliance ProductsAppliance Filters & Accessories CooktopsDishwashersDryersGE Artistry SeriesGE Café SeriesGE MonogramGE Profile SeriesMicrowavesRefrigeratorsRangesSmall Appliances Wall Ovens WashersWater Heaters AviationAviation Services Aviation Systems Business & General Aviation Commercial EnginesGE Capital Aviation Services (GECAS) Marine EnginesMilitary Engines CapitalCommercial Lending & Leasing Consumer FinancingEnergy Financial ServicesGE Capital Aviation ServicesReal Estate FinancingRetail Financing  Consumer Electronics From GEJASCO ProductsCritical PowerAC/DC Power SuppliesAutomatic Transfer SwitchesCritical Power DistributionCustom CapabilitiesDC Power ServicesDistributionInvertersIsolated DC/DC ConvertersLarge Power PlantsManagement SoftwareMedium Power PlantsNon-Isolated DC/DC ConvertersParalleling SwitchgearPower Quality ServicesRetrofit Power SolutionsSmall Power PlantsStatic Transfer SwitchesSurge Protective DevicesUPS Global Services  UPS - Single PhaseUPS – Three Phase DigitalAviationHealthcareManufacturingMiningOil & GasPower DistributionPower GenerationPredix™ Platform for Industrial Internet RailWaterWind Digital Energy Grid ModernizationCapacitorsDistribution AutomationDistribution Management Systems (ADMS)Electrical Balance of Plant (EBoP)Energy Management Systems (EMS)Fiber Optic MultiplexingFlexible AC transmission systems (FACTS)Gas Insulated Switchgear (GIS)Geospatial & Mobile Systems HV/MV Power EquipmentOutage & Storm Management SystemsPower Metering & PQ MonitoringProtection & Control Smart Meters Substation AutomationTransformer Fleet ManagementTransformer Monitoring & DiagnosticsTransformersWireless CommunicationsEnergy ConnectionsAutomation & Process ControlControlsCritical PowerDrivesElectrical DistributionGeospatial SystemsHigh Voltage EquipmentIndustrial CommunicationsMonitoring & DiagnosticsMotors and GeneratorsPower ConversionProtection & ControlSmart MeteringSubstation AutomationUtility Operation SystemsPower Project Consulting ServicesGlobal Power Projects OverviewPower Systems StabilizersSub-Synchronous Torsional Interaction Analysis and Risk MitigationGrid Code TestingRenewables Application IssuesTorsional Stress Relay GE Appliances for ConsumersAll Appliance ProductsCooktopsDishwashersDryersFilters & AccessoriesGE Artistry SeriesGE Café SeriesGE MonogramGE Profile SeriesMicrowavesRangesRefrigeratorsWall OvensWashersWater HeatersService & SupportHealthcareGE Blueprint For Low Dose GE HealthcareGE Healthcare Education GE Healthcare Life Sciences GE Healthcare Products GE Healthcare Services GE Healthcare Specialties Home ImprovementAvantaPure®HomespringHome Standby Generator SystemsPro Elite™ Sealants Industrial SolutionsArc Flash SolutionsBuswayCircuit BreakersContactorsConversion Kits and Trip UnitsCritical PowerDrivesEV ChargingLighting ControlLoad CentersMeteringModular MeteringMotor Control CentersOverload RelaysPanelboards Power Equipment BuildingsPush Buttons & Pilot DevicesRelays & Timers - ControlStartersServicesSolenoids & Limit SwitchesSurge SuppressionSwitchboardsSwitchgear Switches & DisconnectsTerminal Blocks TransformersIntelligent PlatformsIndustrial AutomationControl SystemsHMI/SCADA SoftwareOperator Interfaces & Panel PCsIndustrial ComputersData & AnalyticsData ManagementAdvanced AnalyticsManufacturing SoftwareIndustrial Performance and Reliability CenterEquipment Insight for OEMsEmbedded SystemsSingle Board ComputersHigh Performance Embedded ComputingSensor & Image ProcessingAvionicsNetwork CommunicationsGraphics and VideoRugged Systems & SolutionsLighting for BusinessAll Business LightingBallasts & DriversControl SystemsHazardous LocationIndoor FixturesLED Lamps & ModulesNon-LED LampsOutdoor FixturesRefit Solutions / LED TubesRefrigerated DisplaySignageTransportation Lighting for ConsumersAll Consumer LightingAutomotiveDecorativeGeneral PurposeHoliday LightingLinear FluorescentOutdoorSpecialtyTrack & RecessedVanity & PendantMiningControls and Industrial AutomationMining [PDF]Mining Data and Analytics SoftwareMining EquipmentMining Infrastructure	Mining Power ConversionMining Power DistributionMining Productivity SolutionsMining Water TreatmentOil & GasDistributed Gas DistributionDistributed Gas ProcessingDistributed Gas ProductionDrilling Measurement SolutionsLogging ServicesOffshore DrillingOnshore DrillingLNG Balance Of PlantLNG Gas LiquefactionOilfield Artificial LiftOilfield Gas Processing CompressionOilfield ProductionOilfield Power GenerationSurface Flow ControlSurface Well ControlDownstream PipelineGas ProductionPipeline Integrity ServicesVirtual PipelineRefinery & PetrochemicalFlexible Pipe SolutionsOffshore ProductionOffshore TurbomachinerySubsea Power And ProcessingSubsea Production Control SystemsSubsea ServicesSubsea Trees, Manifolds And Connection SystemsSubsea Wellheads And Connector PipesWellheads And Flow ControlWireline Technology Personal HealthcareGE DiabetesPower Controls and Automation for Heavy Duty Power GenerationControls and Automation for WaterGas Engines — Gas Compression Gas Engines — Distributed Power - Power GenerationGas Turbines — Aeroderivative Gas Turbines – Heavy Duty & Combined Cycle – Power Generation GasificationGeneratorsNuclear Energy Solar Power Steam Turbines Water Treatment Wind Turbines Power ConversionBrilliance LV DriveCompact PodsCylindrical High Speed RotorsDiesel and Gas Engine Driven GeneratorsDirect Drive Wind Turbine Generators Doubly Fed Induction Wind Turbine GeneratorsDynamic SVC DrivesFlameproof Induction MotorsGas and Steam Turbine Driven GeneratorsHigh Performance Controller (HPCi)High Speed MotorsHydro GeneratorsHV Wound Rotor Induction MotorsIncident ReportingIEEE 841 X$D Ultra Laminated Salient Pole Rotors Large Pods Large Slow Speed Marine MotorsLow Voltage Induction MotorsLV7000 Low Voltage DriveLV8000 DriveMV & HV Cage Induction MotorsMV & HV TEFC Induction MotorsMV3000 LV DriveMV4 DrivesMV7000 Drives NEMA Premium Efficient X$D Ultra Power Electronic Controller (PECe)ProCrane LV DriveProMarine LV Drive ProWind LV DriveRemote Support & DiagnosticsSD 7000 – LCI DrivesSmall DC Motors SEMIPOL MV DriveSolid Salient Pole Rotors VDM 25000 MV DriveWind Pitch Motors  Power EconomicsPower Economics OverviewElectricity Market Design, Assessment, and AnalysisSustainability, Climate Change, and Energy Policy AnalysisTransmission and Generation Asset Valuation and Project Pro-FormasDemand-Side Resource/Demand Response Evaluation and AnalysisPower Systems Operation & PlanningPower Systems Operation & Planning OverviewSecure Islanding of Power Plants - System Stability AnalysisReactive Power AdequacyT&D Long-range PlanningEquipment, Switchgear and Arrester ApplicationDSTAR - Distribution R&D for Today's Utility EnvironmentDistribution Automation and Smart Grid AnalysisIndustrial Protection and Control Application, Fast Load-Shed SchemesDistributed Generation Impact StudiesUtility IT & Grid Modernization ProjectsPower Systems Software ProductsSoftware Products OverviewPSLFPSLF TrainingMAPSMARSDSTAR Software Tool TransportationAll Services Diesel Marine Power Diesel Stationary Power Drilling Motors Energy Storage LocomotivesRailway Signaling, Control & Communication Software 








See how GE Works



 
GE Advantage
Across GE, we pride ourselves on driving rigor, operational excellence, and enhanced customer value. That’s why we’re placing some big bets on nearly 40 high impact projects that will help increase our speed to market, improve the quality of our products and services, significantly reduce costs, and drive competitive advantage for our customer and our company. It’s called GE Advantage, and it is changing the way we do business.
Learn More

 



 
Customer Training
GE services support a number of key industries globally. Our training packages include a complete range of content from business specific to leadership and education, leveraging our 50-plus years of experience and the latest available technologies.
Learn More



 





























Commercial | General Tire






























 
 
 
















 













Menu
 
















NEW TIRESBUILT ON PROVEN PERFORMANCE






All the performance and reliability you'll ever need.




                                    LATEST NEWS
                                



TIRE GUIDE




DEALERS















100 YEARSOF RELIABILITY






All the performance and reliability you'll ever need.




                                    LATEST NEWS
                                



TIRE GUIDE




DEALERS



























COMMERCIAL




Whether your operation is highway, regional, urban or on/off-road, you can trust General to deliver commercial truck tires that excel in mileage, handling and durability.










General WT
New Heavy Steer Urban Waste Transport TireA tough open shoulder regional drive tire that delivers reliable traction and high mileage with a compound resistant to cuts and tears.
LEARN MORE 


General HS
New Highway Steer TireBetter tread design and casing platform utilizes proven technology to deliver excellent mileage, even wear and low rolling resistance.
LEARN MORE 


General HD
New Long Haul Drive TireThis enhanced closed shoulder drive tire delivers excellent mileage, while balancing optimal traction and fuel economy.
LEARN MORE 




General HT
New Long Haul Trailer TireThis solid shoulder trailer tire offers stone ejection technologies as well as increased durability, low rolling resistance and a wider casing platform.
LEARN MORE 


D660
Long Haul Drive TireThis solid shoulder drive  tire pattern delivers strong performance in a variety of appliations and features a tread cap with a balance of high mileage and cut/chip resistant properties.
LEARN MORE 


General RA
New Regional All-Position TireA hard working tire designed with an optimal balance of high removal mileage andtread durability for driver confidence in demanding applications.
LEARN MORE 




General RD
New Regional Drive TireA tough open shoulder regional drive tire that delivers reliable traction and high mileage with a compound resistant to cuts and tears.
LEARN MORE 


Grabber™ OA
On/Off Road, All-Position TireDesigned to reduce damage from curbing, cuts and abrasions means you can be confident either on or off the road.
LEARN MORE 


Grabber™ OA WB
On/Off Road, All-Position Wide Base TireHigh carrying capacity and extra-tough tread elements take this aggressively-patterned all position tire to the next level of severe service durability.
LEARN MORE 




Grabber™ OD
On/Off Road, Drive TireBe confident in tough weather and off road conditions, knowing this tire grabs the road with an open shoulder and a deep lug tread design. 
LEARN MORE 









© Continental Tire the Americas, LLC 2016. All Rights Reserved.
Legal | Contact Us







 












TIRE SELECTOR


FIND A DEALER













Commercial Products



































































Eaton
Eaton News
Product News
Events
My.Eaton.com
Contact Us
Where To Buy
 













 

 











Home
Crouse-Hinds
Commercial Products









Divisions


Products


Solutions


Markets


Brands


Resources


Investors


Careers


Contact Us











Business Unit


Products


Solutions


Markets


Products by Name


Resources


Contact Us











products


Solutions


Markets


Products by Name


Resources


Contact Us










 















Solar Combiner Products
Third party certified to UL1741 standards.  Products include standard and custom balance of system combiner boxes, compact combiner boxes, recombiner boxes, disconnect boxes and pass through boxes.

LEARN MORE









Outlet Boxes and Covers
Comprehensive line of boxes and covers that save labor, cut material costs and increase productivity.
LEARN MORE









Myers™ Hubs
The first, the best and the most well recognized “original” hub in the industry.  In addition to being the most recognized brand of hub on the market, Myers offers larger stainless hub trade sizes, aluminum hubs, ATEX approved hubs, cap-offs, drains, and more!
LEARN MORE









Eaton and Cooper – united to power more possibilities
Our combined strength enables us to look at the world through a larger lens, to see more possibilities and better opportunities.  Enabling you to more efficiently manage energy consumption, increase uptime and lower costs - while keeping personnel, equipment and data safe.
EXPECT MORE. FOLLOW THE CHARGE >>









Solar Solutions


Outlet Boxes and Covers


Myers™ Hubs


A Powerful Combination

 


&nbsp





Eaton delivers innovative products for commercial, light industrial and residential applications.  Rely on Eaton for solutions that deliver long, dependable service, labor savings and reduce installed costs – all from a single, dependable source.













Contractor Corner>

Check out some of the 75+ new innovative products introduced in the last few years that will make your job faster, easier, and more cost-effective.  All with the Eaton's Crouse-Hinds quality, innovation, and reliability your customers know and trust.















Solar Solutions>

Solar combiner solutions for grid-tied solar applications integrate a comprehensive line of electrical products with expert support, industry insights, and local availability. Providing the most complete offering of combiners, smart combiners, recombiners, disconnects, pass through boxes, and non-metallic cord grips.










Product News


View more news







Eaton News


View more news














Featured Products


Solar Solutions
Quick-Lok™ Pro Connectors


Commercial Fittings
Outlet Boxes & Covers


PRE-formance
Weatherproof Products






Select a Product



GO










Quick Links

Contact Us
Locate a Sales Rep
Locate a Distributor





























Industry 4.0 - Wikipedia






















 






Industry 4.0

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search





Industrial revolutions and future view


Industry 4.0 is a name for the current trend of automation and data exchange in manufacturing technologies. It includes cyber-physical systems, the Internet of things, cloud computing[1][2][3][4] and cognitive computing.
Industry 4.0 creates what has been called a "smart factory". Within the modular structured smart factories, cyber-physical systems monitor physical processes, create a virtual copy of the physical world and make decentralized decisions. Over the Internet of Things, cyber-physical systems communicate and cooperate with each other and with humans in real time, and via the Internet of Services, both internal and cross-organizational services are offered and used by participants of the value chain.[1]



Contents


1 Name
2 Design principles
3 Meaning
4 Effects
5 Challenges
6 Role of big data and analytics
7 Impact of Industry 4.0
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



Name[edit]
The term "Industrie 4.0" originates from a project in the high-tech strategy of the German government, which promotes the computerization of manufacturing.[5]
The term "Industrie 4.0" was revived in 2011 at the Hannover Fair.[6] In October 2012 the Working Group on Industry 4.0 presented a set of Industry 4.0 implementation recommendations to the German federal government. The Industry 4.0 workgroup members are recognized as the founding fathers and driving force behind Industry 4.0.
Industry 4.0 Workgroups[7]
Co-Chair Henning Kagermann and Siegfried Dais
WG 1 – The Smart Factory: Manfred Wittenstein
WG 2 – The Real Environment: Siegfried Russwurm
WG 3 – The Economic Environment: Stephan Fische
WG 4 – Human Beings and Work: Wolfgang Wahlster
WG 5 – The Technology Factor: Heinz Derenbach
Industry 4.0 Workgroup members
Reinhold Achatz, Heinrich Arnold, Klaus Träger, Johannes Helbig, Wolfram Jost, Peter Leibinger, Reinhard Floss, Volker Smid, Thomas Weber, Eberhard Veit, Christian Zeidler, Reiner Anderl, Thomas Bauernhansl, Michael Beigl, Manfred Brot, Werner Damm, Jürgen Gausemeier, Otthein Herzog, Fritz Klicke, Gunther Reinhart, Bernd Scholz-Reiter, Bernhard Diener, Rainer Platz, Gisela Lanza, Karsten Ortenberg, August Wilhelm Scheer, Henrik von Scheel, Dieter Schwer, Ingrid Sehrbrock, Dieter Spatz, Ursula M. Staudinger, Andreas Geerdeter, Wolf-Dieter Lukas, Ingo Rühmann, Alexander Kettenborn and Clemens Zielinka.
On 8 April 2013 at the Hannover Fair, the final report of the Working Group Industry 4.0 was presented.[8]
Design principles[edit]
There are 4 design principles in Industry 4.0. These principles support companies in identifying and implementing Industry 4.0 scenarios.[1]

Interoperability: The ability of machines, devices, sensors, and people to connect and communicate with each other via the Internet of Things (IoT) or the Internet of People (IoP)

Adding IoT will further automate the process to a large extent[9]




Information transparency: The ability of information systems to create a virtual copy of the physical world by enriching digital plant models with sensor data. This requires the aggregation of raw sensor data to higher-value context information.
Technical assistance: First, the ability of assistance systems to support humans by aggregating and visualizing information comprehensibly for making informed decisions and solving urgent problems on short notice. Second, the ability of cyber physical systems to physically support humans by conducting a range of tasks that are unpleasant, too exhausting, or unsafe for their human co-workers.
Decentralized decisions: The ability of cyber physical systems to make decisions on their own and to perform their tasks as autonomously as possible. Only in the case of exceptions, interferences, or conflicting goals, are tasks delegated to a higher level.

Meaning[edit]
Current usage of the term has been criticised as essentially meaningless, in particular on the grounds that technological innovation is continuous and the concept of a "revolution" in technology innovation is based on a lack of knowledge of the details.[10]
The characteristics given for the German government's Industry 4.0 strategy are: the strong customization of products under the conditions of highly flexibilized (mass-) production. The required automation technology is improved by the introduction of methods of self-optimization, self-configuration,[11] self-diagnosis, cognition and intelligent support of workers in their increasingly complex work.[12] The largest project in Industry 4.0 as of July 2013 is the BMBF leading-edge cluster "Intelligent Technical Systems OstWestfalenLippe (it's OWL)". Another major project is the BMBF project RES-COM,[13] as well as the Cluster of Excellence "Integrative Production Technology for High-Wage Countries".[14] In 2015, the European Commission started the international Horizon 2020 research project CREMA[15] (Providing Cloud-based Rapid Elastic Manufacturing based on the XaaS and Cloud model) as a major initiative to foster the Industry 4.0 topic.
Effects[edit]
In June 2013, consultancy firm McKinsey[16] released an interview featuring an expert discussion between executives at Robert Bosch - Siegfried Dais (Partner of the Robert Bosch Industrietreuhand KG) and Heinz Derenbach (CEO of Bosch Software Innovations GmbH) - and McKinsey experts. This interview addressed the prevalence of the Internet of Things in manufacturing and the consequent technology-driven changes which promise to trigger a new industrial revolution. At Bosch, and generally in Germany, this phenomenon is referred to as Industry 4.0. The basic principle of Industry 4.0 is that by connecting machines, work pieces and systems, businesses are creating intelligent networks along the entire value chain that can control each other autonomously.
Some examples for Industry 4.0 are machines which can predict failures and trigger maintenance processes autonomously or self-organized logistics which react to unexpected changes in production.
According to Dais, "it is highly likely that the world of production will become more and more networked until everything is interlinked with everything else". While this sounds like a fair assumption and the driving force behind the Internet of Things, it also means that the complexity of production and supplier networks will grow enormously. Networks and processes have so far been limited to one factory. But in an Industry 4.0 scenario, these boundaries of individual factories will most likely no longer exist. Instead, they will be lifted in order to interconnect multiple factories or even geographical regions.
There are differences between a typical traditional factory and an Industry 4.0 factory. In the current industry environment, providing high-end quality service or product with the least cost is the key to success and industrial factories are trying to achieve as much performance as possible to increase their profit as well as their reputation. In this way, various data sources are available to provide worthwhile information about different aspects of the factory. In this stage, the utilization of data for understanding current operating conditions and detecting faults and failures is an important topic to research. e.g. in production, there are various commercial tools available to provide overall equipment effectiveness (OEE) information to factory management in order to highlight the root causes of problems and possible faults in the system. In contrast, in an Industry 4.0 factory, in addition to condition monitoring and fault diagnosis, components and systems are able to gain self-awareness and self-predictiveness, which will provide management with more insight on the status of the factory. Furthermore, peer-to-peer comparison and fusion of health information from various components provides a precise health prediction in component and system levels and force factory management to trigger required maintenance at the best possible time to reach just-in-time maintenance and gain near-zero downtime.[17]
Challenges[edit]
Challenges in implementation of Industry 4.0:[citation needed]

IT security issues, which are greatly aggravated by the inherent need to open up those previously closed production shops
Reliability and stability needed for critical machine-to-machine communication (M2M), including very short and stable latency times
Need to maintain the integrity of production processes
Need to avoid any IT snags, as those would cause expensive production outages
Need to protect industrial know how (contained also in the control files for the industrial automation gear)
Lack of adequate skill-sets to expedite the march towards fourth industrial revolution
Threat of redundancy of the corporate IT department
General reluctance to change by stakeholders
Loss of many jobs to automatic processes and IT-controlled processes, especially for lower educated parts of society[18]

Role of big data and analytics[edit]
Modern information and communication technologies like cyber-physical system, big data analytics and cloud computing, will help early detection of defects and production failures, thus enabling their prevention and increasing productivity, quality, and agility benefits that have significant competitive value.
Big data analytics consists of 6Cs in the integrated Industry 4.0 and cyber physical systems environment. The 6C system comprises:

Connection (sensor and networks)
Cloud (computing and data on demand)
Cyber (model & memory)
Content/context (meaning and correlation)
Community (sharing & collaboration)
Customization (personalization and value)

In this scenario and in order to provide useful insight to the factory management, data has to be processed with advanced tools (analytics and algorithms) to generate meaningful information. Considering the presence of visible and invisible issues in an industrial factory, the information generation algorithm has to be capable of detecting and addressing invisible issues such as machine degradation, component wear, etc. in the factory floor.[19][20]
Impact of Industry 4.0[edit]
Proponents of the term claim Industry 4.0 will affect many areas, most notably:

Services and business models
Reliability and continuous productivity
IT security: Companies like Symantec, Cisco, and Penta Security have already begun to address the issue of IoT security
Machine safety
Product lifecycles
Industry value chain
Workers' education and skills
Socio-economic factors
Industry Demonstration: To help industry understand the impact of Industry 4.0, Cincinnati Mayor John Cranley, signed a proclamation to state "Cincinnati to be Industry 4.0 Demonstration City".[21]
An article published in February 2016 suggests that Industry 4.0 may have a beneficial effects for emerging economies such as India.[22]

See also[edit]

Computer-integrated manufacturing
Digital modeling and fabrication
Industrial control system
Intelligent Maintenance Systems
Machine to machine
Predictive manufacturing system
Cyber manufacturing
SCADA
Service 4.0
World Economic Forum 2016
Fourth Industrial Revolution

References[edit]


^ a b c Hermann, Pentek, Otto, 2016: Design Principles for Industrie 4.0 Scenarios, accessed on 4 May 2016
^ Jürgen Jasperneite:Was hinter Begriffen wie Industrie 4.0 steckt in Computer & Automation, 19 Dezember 2012 accessed on 23 December 2012
^ Kagermann, H., W. Wahlster and J. Helbig, eds., 2013: Recommendations for implementing the strategic initiative Industrie 4.0: Final report of the Industrie 4.0 Working Group
^ Heiner Lasi, Hans-Georg Kemper, Peter Fettke, Thomas Feld, Michael Hoffmann: Industry 4.0. In: Business & Information Systems Engineering 4 (6), pp. 239-242
^ BMBF-Internetredaktion (2016-01-21). "Zukunftsprojekt Industrie 4.0 - BMBF". Bmbf.de. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ "Industrie 4.0: Mit dem Internet der Dinge auf dem Weg zur 4. industriellen Revolution". Vdi-nachrichten.com (in German). 2011-04-01. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ "Securing the future of German manufacturing industry : Recommendations for implementing the strategic initiative INDUSTRIE 4.0 : Final report of the Industrie 4.0 Working Group" (PDF). Acatech.de. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ Industrie 4.0 Plattform Last download on 15. Juli 2013
^ "IOT role in industry 4.0". 19 May 2016 – via TechiExpert. 
^ "You Have Reached a 404 Page". 22 September 2013 – via Slate. 
^ Selbstkonfiguierende Automation für Intelligente Technische Systeme, Video, last download on 27. Dezember 2012
^ Jürgen Jasperneite; Oliver, Niggemann: Intelligente Assistenzsysteme zur Beherrschung der Systemkomplexität in der Automation. In: ATP edition - Automatisierungstechnische Praxis, 9/2012, Oldenbourg Verlag, München, September 2012
^ "Herzlich willkommen auf den Internetseiten des Projekts RES-COM - RES-COM Webseite". Res-com-projekt.de. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ "RWTH AACHEN UNIVERSITY Cluster of Excellence "Integrative Production Technology for High-Wage Countries" - English". Production-research.de. 2016-10-19. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ "H2020 CREMA - Cloud-based Rapid Elastic Manufacturing". Crema-project.eu. 2016-11-21. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ Markus Liffler; Andreas Tschiesner (2013-01-06). "The Internet of Things and the future of manufacturing | McKinsey & Company". Mckinsey.com. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ "Tec.News : 26" (PDF). Harting.com. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 
^ {{cite

Low top management commitment
Unclear legal issues and data security
Unclear economic benefits/ Excessive investment
Lack f regulation, standard and forms of certifications
Insufficient qualification of employees

web|url=http://doku.iab.de/forschungsbericht/2015/fb0815.pdf |format=PDF |title=BIBB : Industrie 4.0 und die Folgen für Arbeitsmarkt und Wirtschaft |date=August 2015 |website=Doku.iab.de |accessdate=2016-11-30}}
^ Lee, Jay; Bagheri, Behrad; Kao, Hung-An (2014). "Recent Advances and Trends of Cyber-Physical Systems and Big Data Analytics in Industrial Informatics". IEEE Int. Conference on Industrial Informatics (INDIN) 2014. 
^ Lee, Jay; Lapira, Edzel; Bagheri, Behrad; Kao, Hung-an. "Recent advances and trends in predictive manufacturing systems in big data environment". Manufacturing Letters. 1 (1): 38–41. doi:10.1016/j.mfglet.2013.09.005. 
^ "Cincinnati Mayor Proclaimed "Cincinnati to be Industry 4.0 Demonstration City"". Imscenter.net. Retrieved 2016-07-30. 
^ Anil K Rajvanshi (2016-02-24). "India Can Gain By Leapfrogging Into Fourth Industrial Revolution". The Quint. Retrieved 2016-11-30. 


External links[edit]

Industry 4.0 - Only One-Tenth of Germany's High-Tech Strategy
Cloud-based design and manufacturing
Industrie 4.0 – Hightech-Strategie der Bundesregierung
Bundesministerium für Forschung und Entwicklung - Zukunftsprojekt Industrie 4.0
Plattform Industrie 4.0
Recommendations for implementing the strategic initiative INDUSTRIE 4.0 English edition - www.plattform-i40.de/
BMBF-Spitzencluster"Intelligente technische Systeme OstwestfalenLippe it's OWL
Exzellenzcluster Integrative Produktionstechnik für Hochlohnländer
Communication in Industry 4.0





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Industry_4.0&oldid=792480632"					
Categories: Industrial automationIndustrial computingInternet of thingsTechnology forecastingBig dataIndustrial RevolutionHidden categories: CS1 German-language sources (de)All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2015 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolEuskaraFrançaisहिन्दीItalianoעברית日本語PolskiPortuguêsРусскийSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 19:39.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Our Advertising | GE.com
















































News 



Newsroom 

Press Releases 

Multimedia 

Contacts 


Advertising 

Company Information 


Our Advertising









 
 
 
GE Advertising



    GE Advertising    









Our Advertising





Share on Twitter










  
 








The imagination at work that inspires our products also inspires our advertising. GE commercials bring our digital industrial stories to life.












      What If Millie Dresselhaus, Female Scientist, Was Treated Like A Celebrity    



Watch Now 

 











      Goodbye Useless Productivity Tools - Hello Digital Industrial Age    



Watch Now 

 











      Goodbye Trendy Efficiency Gimmicks - Hello Digital Industrial Age    



Watch Now 

 











      Sarah: Building Amazing Things With Her Two Hands    



Watch Now 

 











      Sarah: Building Advanced, Robot-like Machines    



Watch Now 

 











      Sarah: Building Machines That Can Talk    



Watch Now 

 











      Sarah: Digital Industrial, Just Like PB&J    



Watch Now 

 











      Sarah: It's No Secret GE Is An Industrial Company    



Watch Now 

 











      Raining Octopuses    



Watch Now 

 











      What’s the Matter with Owen? – “Zazzies”    



Watch Now 

 











      What’s the Matter with Owen? – “Hammer”    



Watch Now 

 











      What’s the Matter with Owen? – “Big News"    



Watch Now 

 











      Ideas Are Scary     



Watch Now 

 











      What Would Happen - Taking Energy To New Places    



Watch Now 

 











      Childlike Imagination - What My Mom Does at GE     



Watch Now 

 



































Product (business) - Wikipedia





















 






Product (business)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

In a marketing, a product is anything that can be offered to a market that might satisfy a want or need.[1] In retailing, products are called merchandise. In manufacturing, products are bought as raw materials and sold as finished goods. A service is another common product type.
Commodities are usually raw materials such as metals and agricultural products, but a commodity can also be anything widely available in the open market. In project management, products are the formal definition of the project deliverables that make up or contribute to delivering the objectives of the project. In insurance, the policies are considered products offered for sale by the insurance company that created the contract. In economics and commerce, products belong to a broader category of goods. The economic meaning of product was first used by political economist Adam Smith.[citation needed]
A related concept is that of a sub-product, a secondary but useful result of a production process.
Dangerous products, particularly physical ones, that cause injuries to consumers or bystanders may be subject to product liability.



Contents


1 Product classification

1.1 By use
1.2 By association
1.3 National and international product classifications


2 Product model
3 See also
4 References
5 Further reading
6 External links



Product classification[edit]
A product can be classified as tangible or intangible. A tangible product is a physical object that can be perceived by touch such as a building, vehicle, gadget, or clothing. An intangible product is a product that can only be perceived indirectly such as an insurance policy. Services can be broadly classified under intangible products which can be durable or non durable.
By use[edit]
In its online product catalog, retailer Sears, Roebuck and Company divides its products into "departments", then presents products to potential shoppers according to (1) function or (2) brand.[2] Each product has a Sears item-number and a manufacturer's model-number. Sears uses the departments and product groupings with the intention of helping customers browse products by function or brand within a traditional department-store structure.[3]
By association[edit]
A product line is "a group of products that are closely related, either because they function in a similar manner, are sold to the same customer groups, are marketed through the same types of outlets, or fall within given price ranges."[4] Many businesses offer a range of product lines which may be unique to a single organization or may be common across the business's industry. In 2002 the US Census compiled revenue figures for the finance and insurance industry by various product lines such as "accident, health and medical insurance premiums" and "income from secured consumer loans".[5] Within the insurance industry, product lines are indicated by the type of risk coverage, such as auto insurance, commercial insurance and life insurance.[6]
National and international product classifications[edit]
Various classification systems for products have been developed for economic statistical purposes. The NAFTA signatories are working on a system that classifies products called NAPCS as a companion to North American Industry Classification System (NAICS).[7] The European Union uses a "Classification of Products by Activity" among other product classifications.[8] The United Nations also classifies products for international economic activity reporting.[9]
The Aspinwall Classification System [10][11] classifies and rates products based on five variables:

Replacement rate (How frequently is the product repurchased?)
Gross margin (How much profit is obtained from each product?)
Buyer goal adjustment (How flexible are the buyers' purchasing habits with regard to this product?)
Duration of product satisfaction (How long will the product produce benefits for the user?)
Duration of buyer search behavior (How long will consumers shop for the product?)

The National Institute of Governmental Purchasing (NIGP)[12] developed a commodity and services classification system for use by state and local governments, the NIGP Code.[13] The NIGP Code is used by 33 states within the United States as well as thousands of cities, counties and political subdivisions. The NIGP Code is a hierarchical schema consisting of a 3 digit class, 5 digit class-item, 7 digit class-item-group and an 11 digit class-item-group-detail.[14] Applications of the NIGP Code include vendor registration, inventory item identification, contract item management, spend analysis and strategic sourcing.

Product model[edit]
A manufacturer usually provides an identifier for each particular type of product they make, known as a model, model variant, or model number (often abbreviated as MN, M/N or model no.). For example, Dyson Ltd, a manufacturer of appliances (mainly vacuum cleaners), requires customers to identify their model in the support section of the website.[15] Brand and model can be used together to identify products in the market. The model number is not necessarily the same as the manufacturer part number (MPN).[16]
Because of the huge amount of similar products in the automotive industry, there is a special kind of defining a car with options (marks, attributes), that represent the characteristics features of the vehicle. A model of a car is defined by some basic options like body, engine, gear box and axles. The variants of a model are built by some additional options like color, seats, wheels, mirrors, trims, entertainment and assistant systems etc. Options, that exclude each other (pairwise) build an option-family. That means, that you can choose only one option by each family and you have to choose exactly one option. This kind of product definition fulfill the requirements of an ideal Boolean Algebra and can be helpful to construct a product configurator.[17] Sometimes, a set of options (car features) are combined to an automotive package and are offered by a lower price. A consistent car definition is essential for the production planning and control in the automotive industry, to generate a master production schedule,[18] which is the fundamental for the enterprise resource planning.
In addition, a specific unit of a product is usually (and has to be) identified by a serial number, which is necessary to distinguish products with the same product definition. In the case of automotive products it's called the Vehicle Identification Number VIN, an international standardized format.
See also[edit]

Builder's plate
List of fastest-selling products
Manufacturer part number
Product teardown

References[edit]


^ Kotler, P., Armstrong, G., Brown, L., and Adam, S. (2006) Marketing, 7th Ed. Pearson Education Australia/Prentice Hall.
^ Sears online, sears.com.
^ When an online Sears customer goes to the "Parts and accessories" section of the website to find parts for a particular Sears item, the "model number" field actually requires a Sears item number, not a manufacturer's model number. This is a typical problem with product codes or item codes that are internally assigned by a company but do not conform to an external standard.
^ Kotler, Philip; Gary Armstrong (1989). Principles of Marketing, fourth edition (Annotated Instructor's Edition). Prentice-Hall, Inc. pp. 639 (glossary definition). ISBN 0-13-706129-3. 
^ "2002 Economic Census, Finance and Insurance" US Census Bureau, 2002, p.14.
^ Insurance carrier product lines at DMOZ
^ North American Product Classification System, U.S. Census Bureau
^ Eurostat classifications, ec.europa.eu.
^ United Nations product classifications, unstats.un.org.
^ Leo Aspinwall, 1958, Social Marketing AED Resource p. 45
^ A history of schools of marketing thought, Eric H. Shaw, D.G. Brian Jones, Marketing theory Volume 5(3): 239–281, 2005 SAGE, p. 249
^ National Institute of Governmental Purchasing, nigp.org
^ NIGP Code
^ NIGP Code sample
^ Dyson: Help with your Dyson
^ SOTW, Celebird, et al. "Model Number Vs. MPN". Google Merchant Center: Help forum. August 31, 2009, accessed September 6, 2011.
^ Herlyn: PPS im Automobilbau, Hanser Verlag, München, 2012, S. 81-120
^ Herlyn: PPS im Automobilbau, Hanser Verlag, München, 2012, S. 122 ff.


Further reading[edit]

Herlyn, W.: PPS im Automobilbau - Produktionsprogrammplanung und -steuerung von Fahrzeugen und Aggregaten. Hanser Verlag, München, 2012 - ISBN 978-3-446-41370-2
Stark, John (2015). Product Lifecycle Management: Volume 1: 21st Century Paradigm for Product Realisation. Springer. ISBN 978-3-319-17439-6. 

External links[edit]

 Quotations related to Merchandise at Wikiquote




Authority control



NDL: 00572055










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Product_(business)&oldid=791924214"					
Categories: Business termsProduct managementSupply chain management termsHidden categories: Articles with DMOZ linksAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2015 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


العربيةБеларускаяБългарскиBoarischCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolفارسیFrançaisHrvatskiItalianoעבריתລາວLatviešuLietuviųLimburgsNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаپښتوPolskiPortuguêsРусскийСаха тылаScotsSimple EnglishSlovenčinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 09:37.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Manufacturing in Hong Kong - Wikipedia





















 






Manufacturing in Hong Kong

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Economy of Hong Kong


Identity




Hong Kong Dollar
Banknotes
Coins
Monetary Authority
Four Asian Tigers




Resources




Employment
Transport
Tourism
Postal
Agri/Aqua
Ports
Manufacturing




Companies




Stock Exchange
Growth Enterprise Market
Companies listed on HKSE




Other Hong Kong topics




Culture
Education
Geography
History
Politics




Hong Kong Portal





v
t
e





Manufacturing in Hong Kong consists of mainly light and labour-intensive industries. The manufacturing industry started in the 19th century after the Taiping Rebellion and continues today, although it has largely been replaced by service industries, particularly the finance and real estate industries.
As an entrepôt, Hong Kong had limited manufacturing development until the Second World War, when the development of manufacturing industries was discontinued due to the Japanese occupation. The manufacturing industry of the city revived after the Second World War. The 1950s saw the city's transition from an entrepôt to a manufacturing-based economy. The city's manufacturing industry grew rapidly over the next decade. The industries were diversified in different aspects in the 1970s. One of the most notable reasons of diversification was the oil crisis.



Contents


1 Early development

1.1 1842 to 1918
1.2 1919 to 1950


2 Industrialisation

2.1 1952 to 1962
2.2 1963 to 1970


3 Diversification
4 Industrial relocation

4.1 Formation
4.2 Impacts


5 21st century
6 See also
7 References and footnotes

7.1 Footnotes
7.2 References





Early development[edit]
1842 to 1918[edit]
After the British acquisition of Hong Kong Island in 1842, the manufacturing industry started to develop. Most factories were limited to small workshops producing hand-made goods. Primitive methods, techniques and facilities were used for production. The productivity was low and the manufacturing industry was not as important as the re-exportation industry, which was the most important at the time.[1]
At the beginning of the colonial era, all factories in the city used to be owned by the British.[2] The British-owned factories were mainly limited to shipbuilding and rattan furniture.[3] British industrialists did not consider Hong Kong to be favourable for the manufacturing industry because Hong Kong lacked natural resources, and instead focussed on entrepôt trade and such related industries as shipping and banking.[3]
Guangdong officials fled to Hong Kong because of the Taiping Rebellion in the 1850s and 60s, bringing in capital and boosting the manufacturing industry. Such factories were the first Chinese-owned ones to appear in Hong Kong. The first printing company appeared in 1872, followed by many different industries such as sweets,[3][4] clothing and soap-making.[2] By the end of the 19th century, the first mechanised factories emerged, including a match factory and a pulp company.[3][4]
Small metal and electronic goods had emerged by the early 20th century.[2] With the development of commerce, a few large manufacturing firms appeared. Although these firms were few in number, there was large investment into them and most were leaders in their respective industries.[5] After the Chinese Revolution, many Chinese firms relocated to Hong Kong to avoid the constant warfare between warlords.[5] During the First World War, supplies of daily necessities from Europe were cut off. Industries such as towels, cigarettes and biscuits emerged to support the local population, resulting in a rise in the light industries.[2]
1919 to 1950[edit]
The 1920s and 30s saw the initial rise of the city's manufacturing industry. The textile industry became the backbone of Hong Kong's manufacturing sector. Industries such as the firecracker, glass and leather industries also emerged,[6] and there was a shift from hand-made to machine-made products.[5] Nevertheless, Hong Kong's manufacturing sector was still behind most industrialised cities as the source of capital was rather narrow and was largely limited to Guangdong entrepreneurs.
There are several factors leading to the rise of manufacturing in the 1920s and 30s, including a decline in European industries,[5] the tax reduction granted by the Ottawa Agreement of 1932, and the relocation of factories from Mainland China to Hong Kong.[2] For example, Cheoy Lee Shipyard, the largest Hong Kong-based shipbuilding company as of 2009, moved from Shanghai to Hong Kong in 1936 because of military conflicts between China and Japan.[7]
Hong Kong's manufacturing industry faced many challenges during the early 1930s. After China regained the right to control its tariffs in 1928, the tax imposed on Hong Kong goods rose tremendously, but the Chinese government rejected pleas from Hong Kong industrialists to lower tariffs.[6] The United Kingdom's abolishment of the gold standard destabilised exchange rates. Japan's dumping policy also hit Hong Kong, which did not impose tariffs on exports. The consumption power of Mainland China decreased.[5] The Great Depression further damaged the city's manufacturing sector and led to the liquidation of over 300 factories.[6] However, a series of favourable events led to another surge in the manufacturing sector in 1935, including a decline in Japanese and Italian goods, the stabilisation of exchange rates, an expansion in Mainland markets, and the rise of the Malay Archipelago.[8]




Taikoo Dockyard under a US air raid during the Second World War.


By 1941, there were 1250 factories in Hong Kong with nearly 100,000 employees in the manufacturing sector. The largest industries at the time were shipbuilding, textile manufacturing, torches and plastic shoes. These goods were sold to Mainland China as well as other Southeast Asian countries near the South China Sea. Among these industries, the largest was the shipbuilding industry. The shipyards of Tai Koo, Hung Hom Bay and Cheoy Lee Shipyard were the largest, each employing over 4,000 people.[2]
The manufacturing industry went into a decline during the Japanese occupation. Like most other industries of the city, they faced a near-total destruction by the Japanese.[1] After the end of the Second World War in 1945, Hong Kong earned much by resuming its role as an entrepôt. From 1945 to 1950, its earnings by re-exportation rose by over half every year.[9] This led to the restoration of the city's economy. During this period, most factories that were shut down during the Japanese occupation period were reopened.[1]
Industrialisation[edit]
Industrialisation refers to Hong Kong's transformation from an entrepôt to an industrial city during the 1950s and 1960s.[1] This was also the first change in economic structure in Hong Kong history.[10]
One cause of industrialisation was the Korean War. The United States' embargo on China led to a decline in entrepôt trade with China, Hong Kong's biggest market at the time. This forced Hong Kong to focus on manufacturing instead.[11] Moreover, as China's products could not be shipped to foreign countries, Hong Kong's exports replaced China's.[11] In 1954, the United Nations bought 10 ships from Cheoy Lee Shipyard to help Korea revive.[12]
Another factor was the Chinese Civil War. After the Second Sino-Japanese War, Chinese capitalists bought huge numbers of machines and facilities to restore their pre-war production. As the Civil War broke out, many capitalists moved those facilities to Hong Kong warehouses to continue production. Furthermore, industrialists from Tianjin, Shanghai and Guangzhou relocated to Hong Kong because of the Chinese Civil War. They brought skilled labour, technology and capital to the city.[13] Many Mainlanders also fled to Hong Kong, contributing to the city's labour supply. Altogether, some US$100,000,000 were brought to Hong Kong because of the war. After the war, the facilities and equipment stayed in Hong Kong, causing the rise of Hong Kong's manufacturing industry.[11] From 1946 to 1948, the number of factories increased by 1211 and 81,700 workers employed in the manufacturing sector.[1]
The economic restructuring of more developed countries was another factor. After the Second World War, richer capitalist countries started to upgrade their products and technology, leaving labour-intensive industries to the less developed countries. This encouraged overseas investments and allowed developed technology to be imported to Hong Kong, thereby boosting Hong Kong's manufacturing industry.[11]
1952 to 1962[edit]




Kwun Tong Industrial Estate


From 1952 to 1954, the rate of growth was relatively slow. The number of factories increased from 1902 to 2201, while the number of workers employed in the manufacturing sector rose from 85,300 to 98,200. Nevertheless, the total value of domestic exports dropped from 29,000,000 to 24,170,000 Hong Kong dollars. This was because the manufacturers focused on building factories and altering their products rather than increasing their productivity.[10]
From 1955 to 1962, the rate of growth was faster. The number of factories increased by 1.8 times, while the number of factory workers increased 2.6 times. However, the value of domestic exports decreased from 1958 to 1959. In 1959, for the first time, the value of re-exports exceeded that of exports. By 1962, the value of re-exports had shrunk again to a third of that of exports.[10]
During this time, textile manufacturing and clothing industries took the lead. The Kwun Tong Industrial Estate is the first industrial estate in Hong Kong. By the early 1960s, Hong Kong's textile manufacturing industry was the most successful in Asia.[14]
The textile industry in particular flourished at the time. Chinese textile manufacturers set up many factories in Tsuen Wan.[1] Some of them had dyeing factories and their own docks.[14]
1963 to 1970[edit]
The industrialisation of Hong Kong was rapid from 1963 through 1970. Pre-existing industries continued to prosper, while new industries emerged and blossomed as well. The number of factories increased 1.67 times and the number of workers increased by 1.15 times. The number of factories and workers in 1970 were 16,507 and 549,000 respectively. The latter took up over 40% of the city's employment structure. The value of domestic exports continued to rise, and in just two years, rose by 2.72 times to HK$12,347,000,000. Hong Kong was no longer reliant on re-exportation and became an industrialised city.[10]
One of the new industries that took the lead was the electronics industry, which started to blossom in the 1960s. Another industry was the watch industry.[15] Hong Kong manufacturers mainly made cheap watches and watch parts in the 1960s.[16] Likewise, the toy industry started to succeed during this period.[10]
The textile industry, a pre-existing industry, continued to prosper from 1963 to 1970. Another preexisting industry, the clothing industry, expanded greatly with higher technology. Clothing were exported to other places such as Europe and North America. The Tai Koo and Hung Hom Bay shipyards were turned into housing estates, while Cheoy Lee Shipyard remained and became the first factory to produce boats with fibreglass.[17]
Hong Kong's industrial areas expanded along Victoria Harbour during this period. Prior to the 1960s, most industrial areas were built along both sides of Victoria Harbour. Such areas have been turned into commercial or residential areas.[18]
Diversification[edit]




A map showing the Four Asian Tigers. (From top to bottom: South Korea, Taiwan, Hong Kong and Singapore.)


After Hong Kong became a fully industrialised city, its economy faced two major crises in the 1970s, namely the oil crisis and the rise of other industrial states and cities with similar economic structures, such as Singapore, South Korea, Taiwan, Brazil and Mexico. The first three, along with Hong Kong, are known collectively as the Four Asian Tigers. Before this, the city's economy had faced little competition since Hong Kong's industrial development was earlier than the industrial development of most others.[19]
To rescue the city's manufacturing industry, several measures were taken. First, relatively new industries such as toy, electronics and watches, were developed quickly so that the clothing and textile industries no longer dominated the market.[19] This was also due to the fact that the Western countries imposed severe restrictions on textile imports, while toys, electronics and watches enjoyed reduced tariffs. In 1972, Hong Kong replaced Japan as the largest exporter of toys.[20] Swiss watch companies also moved some of their factories to Hong Kong.[16]
In addition, the quality of products were upgraded. The large number of cheap products were replaced by a smaller number of higher quality and value-added products. Quality and technology of products were also increased as the competition increased. The variety of products were widened. Hong Kong companies also used flexible ways of producing goods. Faced with the severe restrictions of foreign countries, companies made use of the diversity of their products so that another kind of products can be exported when one kind is restricted. The high value-added industry, the jewellery industry, started to emerge in the 1970s.[20]
Places of origin of raw materials became more diversified. For example, Hong Kong bought raw material from Taiwan, Singapore and Korea to reduce reliance on Japan. The percentage of raw materials imported from European and American countries decreased, while the overall percentage of raw materials from Asia increased.[21]
Exportation was no longer limited to large countries such as the United States, the United Kingdom and West Germany. Much effort was put to sell products to smaller countries, although large countries still took up the majority.[21]
More industrial estates and districts were built. This was because there was insufficient land for industrial development, leading to a rise in land rent. In 1971, every square metre of industrial land was sold at HK$1,329.09 at auctions.[21] In this period, the industrial areas were spread all over the city, especially in the New Territories, where new towns such as Tuen Mun and Shatin, were built. A hire-purchase plan was also adopted to relieve pressure from buying land for industrial uses.[22]
Hong Kong managed to maintain its increasing manufacturing rate while diversifying its manufacturing industries. In the 1970s, Hong Kong's factories increased from 16,500 to 22,200. The number of workers increased from 549,000 to 871,000. The value of domestic exports increased from $1,234,700,000 to $5,591,200,000, and increased by 18.18% every year.[22]
The textile industry prospered during the 1970s. The city was the largest supplier of denim. Most of its manufacturers utilised shuttleless weaving machines and there were a total of 29,577 weaving machines.[23] Shoe-makers started to produce leather shoes rather than the cheap shoes in the 1960s.[24] Major clothing companies also emerged[25] and quartz watches were first made during this period.[26]
Industrial relocation[edit]




Chai Wan Factory Estate was constructed in 1959


Formation[edit]
In the 1980s, the labour-intensive industries of Hong Kong, which depended on the city's low costs to remain competitive, faced the problem of increasing land rents and labour costs.[22] Moreover, the increase of population did not suffice as the demand for products grew.[27] Compared to the other three Asian Tigers, Hong Kong's capital-intensive and technology-intensive industries were undeveloped and some less developed countries, such as Thailand, Malaysia and Indonesia, exceeded Hong Kong in the labour-intensive field. Another problem was the increasing protectionism of Western countries, causing some privileges to be removed and extra restrictions placed on Hong Kong products.[22]
Meanwhile, the economic reforms in Mainland China provided a favourable condition for building factories there.[28][29] Mainland China had labour and land and looser pollution control than Hong Kong. The average daily wage of Hong Kong was HK$65 in 1981, compared to HK$2 in Guangdong in 1980. Mainland China's infrastructure and facilities were less developed than Hong Kong, further cutting costs.[30] It also has a lot of flat land for industrial development[29] and a large local market.[29] Therefore, Hong Kong industrialists took advantage of Mainland China's pull factors by relocating their factories there.[31]
Most factories relocated to the Pearl River Delta. The roads, ports and communication networks of the Pearl River Delta were rapid, and places such as Guangzhou and Foshan had good light industry bases. According to government estimates, among the relocated factories, 94% of them relocated to Guangdong from 1989 to 1992. Among those, 43% relocated to Shenzhen and 17% to Dongguan. However, industrial relocation was not limited to Mainland China.[32] Some industrialists relocated their factories to nearby countries such as Thailand,[32] India, the Philippines, Myanmar, Bangladesh, Vietnam, Indonesia, and Malaysia.[31]
Two individual terms were coined. The first, 'made in Hong Kong', refers to the process in which all power, resources (apart from raw materials exported from foreign countries), labour, capital, design and management occur in Hong Kong, and the products are either sold locally or exported overseas. This system is a pre-relocation manufacturing system. The second, 'made by Hong Kong', refers to the process in which capital, design, management and office occur in Hong Kong. However, the power and labour are supplied from Mainland China where the factories are located. Raw materials are transported to Mainland China via Hong Kong. The products are then shipped to overseas countries. This system describes the system that the relocated factories follow.[33]
The first factories were relocated to Mainland China in the late 1970s. The relocation trend reached its peak in the mid-1980s. By the 1990s, over 80% of the factories had been relocated to Mainland China. The value of domestic exports continued to decrease while that of re-exportation from Mainland China increased drastically. In the toy industry, only 7% of the value of exports was gained by domestic exports, while 93% was re-exported from Mainland China. From 1989 to 1994, the value of re-exportation from Mainland China increased by 25.6% annually on average.[28] In the 1990s, the jewellery industry moved most of their manufacturing process to Mainland with the exception of the most valuable jewellery production.[34]
Nevertheless, some factories remained in Hong Kong, either because of importation quotas or limits on place of origin, or because only Hong Kong had the technology required. Industries that produced a small number of high-quality goods need not be relocated. Some factories also remained because they had overseas branches.[32] Family workshops also stayed.[35]
Impacts[edit]
Industrial relocation has, to some extent, contributed to the upgrade of industries. The labour-intensive industries of Hong Kong were turned into capital-intensive and technology-intensive industries.[35] The relocated Mainland factories became more effective than before their relocation thus increasing the productivity of the manufacturers. From 1985 to 2004, the total amount made by such manufacturers rose from HK$208,000 to HK$942,000.[36] Products produced in the Mainland are also more competitive due to low costs.[37]
The environment of Hong Kong has improved while that of Mainland China is heavily polluted. The Pearl River Delta faced serious water pollution and much farmland was turned into industrial uses. The primary industry of Guangdong decreased from 70.7% to only 32.9%, while that of the secondary industry rose from 12.2% to 20.7%. From 1988 to 2009, the area of rice fields dropped by 32%.[38] Consequently, local governments of South China passed laws to restrict industrial pollution.[39]
The livelihood of people in Mainland China has improved. Many people no longer need to farm for a living. In 1987, over a million workers were employed by Hong Kong industrialists (which increased to 10 million as of 2005[37]) in Mainland China.[27] Local governments in China earn money, which are used to improve the infrastructure of China, through land rent and taxes. Therefore, the economy of the Pearl River Delta was boosted alongside the improvement of living standards.[37]
As the manufacturing industry declined, the tertiary industry rose. The service sector continues to prosper to this day. In 1980, the tertiary sector took up only 48.4% of Hong Kong's employment structure.[36] By 2008, 87.1% of all employees worked in the service industry while employee rates of the manufacturing industry dropped to 4.6%.[40] The relocated factories needed support services including shipping, insurance, and above all, finance. Due to more people working in the tertiary sector, Hong Kong's economy grew increasingly reliant on service industries.[41]




Hong Kong Science Park.


The finance and real estate industries bloomed in the 1990s. However, the dependence on such industries caused a loss of competitiveness between products produced by Hong Kong-based manufacturers and those from the international market. The other Asian Tigers had developed capital-intensive industries such as crude oil, computers and heavy industries.[42] As a result, the government of Hong Kong has tried to develop knowledge-based, high-technology and higher-value-added industries. High-technology training programmes have been provided as well as courses related to information technology and biotechnology. Land was used for high-technology industries, notably Cyberport. Research centres have been set up to support such industries, notably the Hong Kong Science and Technology Park.[39] High-technology exports took up one-third of Hong Kong's total exports in 2005.[43] Manufacturing workers who are unskilled in other areas are unemployed as a result of industrial relocation.[37][44] To aid them, the government provided retraining programmes, allowing them, especially those in the tertiary industry, to get new jobs.[38]
21st century[edit]
As of 2008, the printing and publishing industry takes up 24.6% of the employment structure of the city's manufacturing sector, followed by the food and beverage industry at 17.5%. The textile, clothing and electronic industries took up only 9.8%, 8.7% and 7.6% respectively.[45] The clothing industry accounted for 35.6% of the value of domestic exports of the manufacturing sector in 2007, while the electronics industry took up 18.0% of it. Chemical products, jewellery, textiles, and printing and publishing industries took up 9.8%, 8.0%, 3.3%, and 2.6% respectively.[46]
Despite the relocation of light and labour-intensive industries, heavy industries are still rare in Hong Kong.[47] The large population of Hong Kong remains favourable for labour-intensive industries, the raw materials and products of light industries are easier to transport than the heavy industries, and there is insufficient flat land in Hong Kong for heavy industries.[47]
In the 21st century, industrialists in Shenzhen have expressed interest in cooperating with Hong Kong in high-technology manufacturing industries. They want to share business-related information with Hong Kong and use the city's financial services such as the electronics industry. Quaternary industries such as the software industry and tertiary industries such as environmental protection companies are also interested.[48]
See also[edit]

Public factory estates in Hong Kong
Companies of Hong Kong

References and footnotes[edit]
Footnotes[edit]


^ a b c d e f 封, p.28
^ a b c d e f 封, p.27
^ a b c d Zhang 1999, p.227
^ a b Zhang 1996, p.140
^ a b c d e Zhang 1996, p.141
^ a b c Zhang 1999, p.229
^ 何, p.11
^ Zhang 1996, p.141
^ 何, p.2
^ a b c d e 封, p.30
^ a b c d 封, p.29
^ 何, p.12
^ 何, p.3
^ a b 何, p. 23
^ 何, p.71
^ a b 何, p.55
^ 何, p.15
^ Ip, Lam, and Wong, p.10
^ a b 封, p.31
^ a b 封, p.32
^ a b c 封, p.33
^ a b c d 封, p.34
^ 何, p.22
^ 何, p.35
^ 何, p.38
^ 何, p.57
^ a b Kristof
^ a b 封, p.35
^ a b c Keung
^ Ip, Lam and Wong, p.20
^ a b Ip, Lam and Wong, p.15
^ a b c 封, p.36
^ Ip, Lam, and Wong, p.16
^ 何, p.884
^ a b 封, p.37
^ a b Ip, Lam and Wong, p.26
^ a b c d Ip, Lam and Wong, p.28
^ a b Ip, Lam and Wong, p.30
^ a b Ip, Lam and Wong, p.31
^ Hong Kong Yearbook, p.124
^ 何, p.88
^ 何, p.112
^ Lau, p.ii
^ 何, p.99
^ Hong Kong Yearbook, p.98
^ Hong Kong Yearbook 2007, p.102
^ a b Ip, Lam and Wong, p.8
^ Lau, p.iii


References[edit]
http://spymysupplier.com/

Ip, Kim Wai; Lam, Chi Chung; Wong, Kam Fai (2007). Exploring Geography. 1B (2nd ed.). Oxford University Press. pp. 8–35. ISBN 978-0-19-548660-5. 
何, 耀生 (2009). 香港製造‧製造香港 [Made in Hong Kong — Making Hong Kong] (in Chinese) (1st ed.). 明報出版社有限公司. pp. 1–153. ISBN 978-962-8994-99-1. 
封, 小雲; 龔, 唯平 (1997). 香港工業2000 [Hong Kong Industries 2000] (in Chinese) (2nd ed.). Joint Publishing. ISBN 962-04-1382-2. 
Hong Kong Yearbook 2008. Government of Hong Kong. 2008. 
Hong Kong Yearbook 2007. Government of Hong Kong. 2007. 
Keung, Hon-ming. "工業北移 [Industries Moving to the North]". 地理入門 [Gateway to Geography] (in Chinese). HKEdCity. Retrieved 7 July 2010. 
Kristof, Nicholas D. (September 4, 1987). "China: Hong Kong's Factory". The New York Times. Retrieved 10 July 2010. 
Zhang, Li (25 January 1999). "1937- 1941 年香港华资工业的发展 [Development of Chinese-owned Enterprises in Hong Kong from 1937 to 1941]" (PDF). Modern Chinese History Studies (in Chinese). China: China Academic Journal Electronic Publishing House (1). Retrieved 17 January 2013. 
Zhang, Xiaohui (25 January 1996). "近代香港的华资工业 [Chinese-owned Industries in Modern Hong Kong]" (PDF). Modern Chinese History Studies (in Chinese). China: China Academic Journal Electronic Publishing House (1). Retrieved 17 January 2013. 




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Industry in Hong Kong.








v
t
e


Manufacturing in Asia



Sovereign states



Afghanistan
Armenia
Azerbaijan
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Bhutan
Brunei
Cambodia
China
Cyprus
East Timor (Timor-Leste)
Egypt
Georgia
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Israel
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
North Korea
South Korea
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Lebanon
Malaysia
Maldives
Mongolia
Myanmar
Nepal
Oman
Pakistan
Philippines
Qatar
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Sri Lanka
Syria
Tajikistan
Thailand
Turkey
Turkmenistan
United Arab Emirates
Uzbekistan
Vietnam
Yemen





States with
limited recognition



Abkhazia
Nagorno-Karabakh
Northern Cyprus
Palestine
South Ossetia
Taiwan





Dependencies and
other territories



British Indian Ocean Territory
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Hong Kong
Macau










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Manufacturing_in_Hong_Kong&oldid=790664760"					
Categories: Manufacturing in Hong KongHidden categories: CS1 Chinese-language sources (zh) 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 15 July 2017, at 07:11.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Porter's five forces analysis - Wikipedia






















 






Porter's five forces analysis

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Porter five forces analysis)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search





A graphical representation of Porter's five forces


Porter's five forces analysis is a framework for analyzing the level of competition within an industry and business strategy development. It draws upon industrial organization (IO) economics to derive five forces that determine the competitive intensity and therefore the attractiveness of an industry. Attractiveness in this context refers to the overall industry profitability. An "unattractive" industry is one in which the combination of these five forces acts to drive down overall profitability. A very unattractive industry would be one approaching "pure competition", in which available profits for all firms are driven to normal profit. This analysis is associated with its principal innovator Michael E. Porter of Harvard University.
Porter refers to these forces as the micro environment, to contrast it with the more general term macro environment. They consist of those forces close to a company that affect its ability to serve its customers and make a profit. A change in any of the forces normally requires a business unit to re-assess the marketplace given the overall change in industry information. The overall industry attractiveness does not imply that every firm in the industry will return the same profitability. Firms are able to apply their core competencies, business model or network to achieve a profit above the industry average. A clear example of this is the airline industry. As an industry, profitability is low and yet individual companies, by applying unique business models, have been able to make a return in excess of the industry average.
Porter's five forces include three forces from 'horizontal' competition: the threat of substitute products or services, the threat of established rivals, and the threat of new entrants; and two forces from 'vertical' competition: the bargaining power of suppliers and the bargaining power of customers.
Porter developed his five forces analysis in reaction to the then-popular SWOT analysis, which he found unrigorous and ad hoc.[1] Porter's five forces is based on the structure–conduct–performance paradigm in industrial organizational economics. It has been applied to a diverse range of problems, from helping businesses become more profitable to helping governments stabilize industries.[2] Other Porter strategic frameworks include the value chain and the generic strategies.



Contents


1 Five forces

1.1 Threat of new entrants
1.2 Threat of substitutes
1.3 Bargaining power of customers
1.4 Bargaining power of suppliers
1.5 Industry rivalry


2 Usage
3 Criticisms
4 See also
5 References
6 Further reading



Five forces[edit]


Strategy







Major dimensions


Strategy •  Strategic management
Military strategy •  Strategic thinking
Strategic planning •  Game theory
Strategic studies








Major thinkers


Michael Porter  •  Henry Mintzberg
Bruce Henderson  •  Gary Hamel  •  C. K. Prahalad
Jim Collins  •  Liddell Hart
Carl von Clausewitz  •  Sun Tzu
Adrian Slywotzky  •  Chris Zook
Clay Christensen








Concepts


Business model
Competitive advantage  •  Experience curve
Value chain •  Portfolio theory
Core competency •  Generic strategies
Uberisation
Sharing economy








Frameworks and tools


SWOT • Five forces
Balanced scorecard
PEST analysis  •  Growth–share matrix









v
t
e





Threat of new entrants[edit]
Profitable markets that yield high returns will attract new firms. This results in many new entrants, which eventually will decrease profitability for all firms in the industry. Unless the entry of new firms can be blocked by incumbents (which in business refers to the largest company in a certain industry, for instance, in telecommunications, the traditional phone company, typically called the "incumbent operator"), the abnormal profit rate will trend towards zero (perfect competition).
The following factors can have an effect on how much of a threat new entrants may pose:

The existence of barriers to entry (patents, rights, etc.). The most attractive segment is one in which entry barriers are high and exit barriers are low. Few new firms can enter and non-performing firms can exit easily.
Government policy
Capital requirements
Absolute cost
Cost disadvantages independent of size
Economies of scale
Economies of product differences
Product differentiation
Brand equity
Switching costs or sunk costs
Expected retaliation
Access to distribution
Customer loyalty to established brands
Industry profitability (the more profitable the industry the more attractive it will be to new competitors)
Network effect

Threat of substitutes[edit]
The existence of products outside of the realm of the common product boundaries increases the propensity of customers to switch to alternatives. For example, tap water might be considered a substitute for Coke, whereas Pepsi is a competitor's similar product. Increased marketing for drinking tap water might "shrink the pie" for both Coke and Pepsi, whereas increased Pepsi advertising would likely "grow the pie" (increase consumption of all soft drinks), albeit while giving Pepsi a larger slice at Coke's expense. Another example is the substitute of a landline phone with a cellular phone.
Potential factors:

Buyer propensity to substitute
Relative price performance of substitute
Buyer switching costs
Perceived level of product differentiation
Number of substitute products available in the market
Ease of substitution
Substandard product
Quality depreciation
Availability of close substitute

Bargaining power of customers[edit]
The bargaining power of customers is also described as the market of outputs: the ability of customers to put the firm under pressure, which also affects the customer's sensitivity to price changes. Firms can take measures to reduce buyer power, such as implementing a loyalty program. The buyer power is high if the buyer has many alternatives. The buyer power is low if they act independently e.g. If a large number of customers will act with each other and ask to make prices low the company will have no other choice because of large number of customers pressure.
Potential factors:

Buyer concentration to firm concentration ratio
Degree of dependency upon existing channels of distribution
Bargaining leverage, particularly in industries with high fixed costs
Buyer switching costs relative to firm switching costs
Buyer information availability
Force down prices
Availability of existing substitute products
Buyer price sensitivity
Differential advantage (uniqueness) of industry products
RFM (customer value) Analysis
The total amount of trading

Bargaining power of suppliers[edit]
The bargaining power of suppliers is also described as the market of inputs. Suppliers of raw materials, components, labor, and services (such as expertise) to the firm can be a source of power over the firm when there are few substitutes. If you are making biscuits and there is only one person who sells flour, you have no alternative but to buy it from them. Suppliers may refuse to work with the firm or charge excessively high prices for unique resources.
Potential factors are:

Supplier switching costs relative to firm switching costs
Degree of differentiation of inputs
Impact of inputs on cost and differentiation
Presence of substitute inputs
Strength of distribution channel
Supplier concentration to firm concentration ratio
Employee solidarity (e.g. labor unions)
Supplier competition: the ability to forward vertically integrate and cut out the buyer.

Industry rivalry[edit]
For most industries the intensity of competitive rivalry is the major determinant of the competitiveness of the industry.
Potential factors:

Sustainable competitive advantage through innovation
Competition between online and offline companies
Level of advertising expense
Powerful competitive strategy
Firm concentration ratio
Degree of transparency

Usage[edit]
Strategy consultants occasionally use Porter's five forces framework when making a qualitative evaluation of a firm's strategic position. However, for most consultants, the framework is only a starting point or "checklist". They might use value chain or another type of analysis in conjunction.[3] Like all general frameworks, an analysis that uses it to the exclusion of specifics about a particular situation is considered naive.
According to Porter, the five forces model should be used at the line-of-business industry level; it is not designed to be used at the industry group or industry sector level. An industry is defined at a lower, more basic level: a market in which similar or closely related products and/or services are sold to buyers. (See industry information.) A firm that competes in a single industry should develop, at a minimum, one five forces analysis for its industry. Porter makes clear that for diversified companies, the first fundamental issue in corporate strategy is the selection of industries (lines of business) in which the company should compete; and each line of business should develop its own, industry-specific, five forces analysis. The average Global 1,000 company competes in approximately 52 industries (lines of business)[citation needed].
Criticisms[edit]
Porter's framework has been challenged by other academics and strategists such as Stewart Neill. Similarly, Kevin P. Coyne and Somu Subramaniam have claimed that three dubious assumptions underlie the five forces:

That buyers, competitors, and suppliers are unrelated and do not interact and collude.
That the source of value is structural advantage (creating barriers to entry).
That uncertainty is low, allowing participants in a market to plan for and respond to competitive behavior.[4]

An important extension to Porter was found in the work of Adam Brandenburger and Barry Nalebuff of Yale School of Management in the mid-1990s. Using game theory, they added the concept of complementors (also called "the 6th force"), helping to explain the reasoning behind strategic alliances. Complementors are known as the impact of related products and services already in the market.[5] The idea that complementors are the sixth force has often been credited to Andrew Grove, former CEO of Intel Corporation. According to most references, the sixth force is government or the public. Martyn Richard Jones, whilst consulting at Groupe Bull, developed an augmented 5 forces model in Scotland in 1993. It is based on Porter's model and includes Government (national and regional) as well as Pressure Groups as the notional 6th force. This model was the result of work carried out as part of Groupe Bull's Knowledge Asset Management Organisation initiative.
Porter indirectly rebutted the assertions of other forces, by referring to innovation, government, and complementary products and services as "factors" that affect the five forces.[6]
It is also perhaps not feasible to evaluate the attractiveness of an industry independent of the resources a firm brings to that industry. It is thus argued (Wernerfelt 1984)[7] that this theory be coupled with the Resource-Based View (RBV) in order for the firm to develop a much more sound strategy. It provides a simple perspective for accessing and analyzing the competitive strength and position of a corporation, business or organization.
See also[edit]

Coopetition
National Diamond
Value chain
Porter's four corners model
Industry classification
Nonmarket forces
Economics of Strategy

References[edit]



^ Michael Porter, Nicholas Argyres, Anita M. McGahan, "An Interview with Michael Porter", The Academy of Management Executive 16:2:44 at JSTOR
^ Michael Simkovic, Competition and Crisis in Mortgage Securitization
^ Tang, David (21 October 2014). "Introduction to Strategy Development and Strategy Execution". Flevy. Retrieved 2 November 2014. 
^ Kevin P. Coyne and Somu Subramaniam, Bringing discipline to strategy, The McKinsey Quarterly, 1996, Number 4, pp. 14-25
^ Brandenburger, A. M., & Nalebuff, B. J. (1995). The right game: Use game theory to shape strategy. Harvard Business Review, 73(4), 57-71. PDF
^ Michael E. Porter. "The Five Competitive Forces that Shape Strategy", Harvard Business Review, January 2008, p.86-104. PDF
^ Wernerfelt, B. (1984), A resource-based view of the firm, Strategic Management Journal, Vol. 5, (April–June): pp. 171-180 PDF



Further reading[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Porter's Five Forces Model.



Coyne, K.P. and Sujit Balakrishnan (1996),Bringing discipline to strategy, The McKinsey Quarterly, No.4.
Porter, M.E. (March–April 1979) How Competitive Forces Shape Strategy, Harvard Business Review.
Porter, M.E. (1980) Competitive Strategy, Free Press, New York.
Porter, M.E. (January 2008) The Five Competitive Forces That Shape Strategy, Harvard Business Review.
Ireland, R. D., Hoskisson, R., & Hitt, M. (2008). Understanding business strategy: Concepts and cases. Cengage Learning.
Rainer R.K. and Turban E. (2009), Introduction to Information Systems (2nd edition), Wiley, pp 36–41.
Kotler P. (1997), Marketing Management, Prentice-Hall, Inc.
Mintzberg, H., Ahlstrand, B. and Lampel J. (1998) Strategy Safari, Simon & Schuster.







v
t
e


Strategic planning tools






Ansoff Matrix
Balanced scorecard
Competitor analysis
Growth–share matrix
Mind map
PEST analysis
Porter's five forces analysis
Scenario planning
SWOT analysis










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Porter%27s_five_forces_analysis&oldid=783414749"					
Categories: Strategic managementBusiness planningBusiness termsMichael PorterManagementHidden categories: All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from May 2015Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDeutschΕλληνικάEspañolFrançais한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתLatviešuMagyarမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийසිංහලSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 June 2017, at 04:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 













  General Electric
 - YouTube 


 
  





















































































 
 


 
            體驗新版 YouTube。瞭解詳情。
    
關閉

 
略過導覽功能
  
 

 
TW登入搜尋
 



 
      General Electric
    
 影片
 播放清單
 頻道
 簡介
 

 












            首頁
          










            發燒影片
          










            觀看紀錄
          











      YouTube 精選
    




 










            音樂
          







 










            運動
          







 










            遊戲
          







 










            新聞
          







 










            直播
          







 










            360° 影片
          

















            瀏覽頻道
          










      現在就登入，查看您的頻道與推薦內容！
    

登入























































  


 
            選擇語言。

    
關閉 


瞭解詳情
View this message in English

您目前的 YouTube 語言設為中文 (繁體)。
您可以在下方變更這項偏好設定。
    


Learn more

      You're viewing YouTube in Chinese (Taiwan).
        You can change this preference below.
    


 





候播清單候播清單候播清單候播清單 
全部移除中斷連線







即將播放下一部影片停止 


載入中…
    

 



 

候播清單
    
候播清單

__count__/__total__
    















































          GE's Website
        














General Electric




訂閱已訂閱取消訂閱151,238 












載入中…
    









載入中…
    













        處理中...
    




















首頁


影片


播放清單


頻道


簡介

























The Power Of 3D Additive Printing - In The Wild - GE



          觀看次數：462,399
        

            2 個月前
          



          Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKJoin “Tested” host Adam Savage and “Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward as they go inside GE Power’s advanced manufacturing facility in Greenville, SC to learn a brand new process of additive printing. From its digital design, to its setup, 3-D print, clean, and test, Adam and Alie will follow the process of creating a gas turbine component that is used to power homes more efficiently.GE works on things that matter. The best people and the best technologies taking on the toughest challenges. Finding solutions in energy, health and home, transportation and finance. Building, powering, moving and curing the world. Not just imagining. Doing. GE works.Connect with GE Online:Visit GE's Website: http://invent.geFind GE on Google +: http://invent.ge/1dPUUN5Find GE on Tumblr: http://invent.ge/17syCNfFind GE on Facebook: http://invent.ge/1929rzTFollow GE on Twitter: http://invent.ge/XJAX15Follow GE on Pinterest: http://invent.ge/16JjInYFollow GE on Instagram: http://invent.ge/1a9XZGbFind GE on LinkedIn: http://invent.ge/1gtUi3e

顯示節錄內容
          


閱讀詳情
        
















In the Wild - GE


全部播放


        "Tested” host Adam Savage and “Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward team up to explore industrial innovation in the places where they actually happen: behind the scenes of GE's leading facilities.
    







 







 7:30

播放下一部立即播放






Under The Hood Of GE's Revolutionary CT Scanner - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：7 分鐘 30 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：737,7432 個月前 









 







 8:12

播放下一部立即播放






How GE Uses Wind To Help Power Nearly One Million German Homes - In The Wild – GE - 播放時間：8 分鐘 12 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：181,5332 個月前 









 







 6:09

播放下一部立即播放






Inside Jet Engine Manufacturing & Testing - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：6 分鐘 9 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：380,5092 個月前 









 







 6:27

播放下一部立即播放






Inside A Tier 4 Locomotive: From Engine Building To Train Monitoring - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：6 分鐘 27 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：531,2912 個月前 









 







 6:04

播放下一部立即播放






Behind The Digitization Of Shipping Logistics - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：6 分鐘 4 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：533,8632 個月前 









 







 7:41

播放下一部立即播放






The Power Of 3D Additive Printing - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：7 分鐘 41 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：462,3992 個月前 







 

 









已隱藏這個項目










Unimpossible Missions - GE


全部播放








 







 2:14

播放下一部立即播放






'You Can’t Fight Fire with Fire' - Unimpossible Missions - GE 360 - 播放時間：2 分鐘 14 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：623,9476 個月前 
字幕









 







 3:18

播放下一部立即播放






Adam Savage Fights Fire with Fire - Unimpossible Missions - 播放時間：3 分鐘 18 秒。
Tested 

觀看次數：454,0196 個月前 









 







 2:10

播放下一部立即播放






Behind The Scenes: 'You Can’t Fight Fire with Fire' - Unimpossible Missions - GE 360 - 播放時間：2 分鐘 10 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：15,9745 個月前 









 







 2:55

播放下一部立即播放






'You Can't Unring a Bell' - Unimpossible Missions - GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 55 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：1,115,9346 個月前 









 







 2:39

播放下一部立即播放






Adam Savage Unrings a Bell - Unimpossible Missions - 播放時間：2 分鐘 39 秒。
Tested 

觀看次數：219,9156 個月前 









 







 3:20

播放下一部立即播放






'A Snowball’s Chance in Hell' - Unimpossible Missions - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘 20 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：901,2311 年前 









 







 2:53

播放下一部立即播放






Adam Savage Gives a Snowball a Chance in Hell - Unimpossible Missions - 播放時間：2 分鐘 53 秒。
Tested 

觀看次數：353,3616 個月前 









 







 3:00

播放下一部立即播放






'Like Talking to a Wall' - Unimpossible Missions - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘。
General Electric 

觀看次數：585,8156 個月前 









 







 3:17

播放下一部立即播放






Adam Savage Talks to a Wall - Unimpossible Missions - 播放時間：3 分鐘 17 秒。
Tested 

觀看次數：241,8006 個月前 









 







 2:30

播放下一部立即播放






'Catching Lightning in a Bottle' - Unimpossible Missions - GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 30 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：241,7805 個月前 









 







 2:10

播放下一部立即播放






Adam Savage Catches Lightning in a Bottle - Unimpossible Missions - 播放時間：2 分鐘 10 秒。
Tested 

觀看次數：452,0865 個月前 









 







 1:41

播放下一部立即播放






Chris Nguyen, GE Unimpossible Missions University Challenge Winner - GE - 播放時間：101 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：22,1065 個月前 







 

 









已隱藏這個項目






 


Featured - GE


全部播放


        Check out the featured videos from GE!
    




 







 0:46

播放下一部立即播放






How A Grid In Motion Powers Us All Ft. Mackenzie Ziegler & Gryffin - GE - 播放時間：46 秒。
General Electric 


1 個月前觀看次數：193,935 


        "Dance Moms" star Mackenzie Ziegler, modern dancers, and musician Gryffin team up with GE to show the complex choreography of the transmission of energy, and how it moves to power us all.Subscribe...
    








 







 7:30

播放下一部立即播放






Under The Hood Of GE's Revolutionary CT Scanner - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：7 分鐘 30 秒。
General Electric 


2 個月前觀看次數：737,743 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZK“Tested” host Adam Savage and “Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward visit GE Healthcare’s Revolutionary CT testing facility, where they'...
    








 







 8:12

播放下一部立即播放






How GE Uses Wind To Help Power Nearly One Million German Homes - In The Wild – GE - 播放時間：8 分鐘 12 秒。
General Electric 


2 個月前觀看次數：181,533 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZK“Tested” host Adam Savage and “Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward travel to Germany to visit the facility where GE builds the world’s ...
    








 







 6:27

播放下一部立即播放






Inside A Tier 4 Locomotive: From Engine Building To Train Monitoring - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：6 分鐘 27 秒。
General Electric 


2 個月前觀看次數：531,291 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZK“Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward goes inside the GE Transportation Engine Plant in Grove City, PA to learn about building and testi...
    








 







 6:04

播放下一部立即播放






Behind The Digitization Of Shipping Logistics - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：6 分鐘 4 秒。
General Electric 


2 個月前觀看次數：533,863 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZK“Tested” host Adam Savage and “Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward head to the Port of Los Angeles in San Pedro, CA to take a look at t...
    








 







 6:09

播放下一部立即播放






Inside Jet Engine Manufacturing & Testing - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：6 分鐘 9 秒。
General Electric 


2 個月前觀看次數：380,509 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKWhen flying in an airplane, how often do you think of its jet engines? At the GE Aviation facility in Peebles, OH, “Tested” host Adam Savage a...
    








 







 7:41

播放下一部立即播放






The Power Of 3D Additive Printing - In The Wild - GE - 播放時間：7 分鐘 41 秒。
General Electric 


2 個月前觀看次數：462,399 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKJoin “Tested” host Adam Savage and “Innovation Nation” correspondent Alie Ward as they go inside GE Power’s advanced manufacturing facility in...
    








 







 4:11

播放下一部立即播放






GE Engineers Save Countless Lives In The Wake Of Tragedy - Together We Work - GE - 播放時間：4 分鐘 11 秒。
General Electric 


3 個月前觀看次數：63,754 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKSince 2011, GE medical technicians have volunteered to staff temporary hospitals during the Hajj— the longest running mass assemblage on Earth—...
    








 







 1:01

播放下一部立即播放






What If Millie Dresselhaus, Female Scientist, Was Treated Like A Celebrity - GE - 播放時間：61 秒。
General Electric 


5 個月前觀看次數：945,221 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKAt GE, we're not just imagining a world where brilliant women in science are treated like stars – we're helping create it. We know that a compa...
    
字幕




顯示完整資訊






已隱藏這個項目










GE Commercials


全部播放








 







 0:32

播放下一部立即播放






Goodbye Useless Productivity Tools - Hello Digital Industrial Age - GE - 播放時間：32 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：9,5415 個月前 









 







 0:31

播放下一部立即播放






Goodbye Trendy Efficiency Gimmicks - Hello Digital Industrial Age - GE - 播放時間：31 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：6,4365 個月前 









 







 1:01

播放下一部立即播放






What If Millie Dresselhaus, Female Scientist, Was Treated Like A Celebrity - GE - 播放時間：61 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：945,2215 個月前 
字幕









 







 0:40

播放下一部立即播放






Sarah: Building Amazing Things With Her Two Hands - GE - 播放時間：40 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：38,27511 個月前 









 







 0:40

播放下一部立即播放






Sarah: Building Advanced, Robot-like Machines - GE - 播放時間：40 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：44,04911 個月前 









 







 0:40

播放下一部立即播放






Sarah: Building Machines That Can Talk - GE - 播放時間：40 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：43,00111 個月前 









 







 0:40

播放下一部立即播放






Sarah: Digital Industrial, Just Like PB&J - GE - 播放時間：40 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：43,84011 個月前 









 







 1:05

播放下一部立即播放






Sarah: It's No Secret GE Is An Industrial Company - GE - 播放時間：65 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：412,57511 個月前 









 







 2:04

播放下一部立即播放






Enter the Digital Industrial – GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 4 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：86,7751 年前 









 







 1:28

播放下一部立即播放






The Intelligent Pipeline Solution From GE And Accenture - GE - 播放時間：88 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：25,7092 年前 









 







 1:16

播放下一部立即播放






Ideas Are Scary - GE Commercial - 播放時間：76 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：1,002,1812 年前 









 







 1:02

播放下一部立即播放






Childlike Imagination - What My Mom Does at GE - 播放時間：62 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：2,208,2883 年前 








查看另外 1 項





 

 









已隱藏這個項目






 


Together We Work - GE Employees


全部播放





 







 3:24

播放下一部立即播放






Train Lover's Childhood Dream Comes True, Finds Home At GE - Together We Work - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘 24 秒。
General Electric 


6 個月前觀看次數：187,644 


        “When I was a kid, I was obsessed with trains.” Mike Patton, a passionate GE transportation employee, is living his childhood dreams as part of a group jokingly referred to as “foamers.”Subscribe ...
    








 







 4:36

播放下一部立即播放






Female Engineer Powers Pakistan & Empowers Girls - Together We Work - GE - 播放時間：4 分鐘 36 秒。
General Electric 


5 個月前觀看次數：201,346 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKGE engineer Ayesha Imtiaz is only getting started, but she’s already overcome and achieved more than many people twice her age. As the highest ...
    








 







 4:39

播放下一部立即播放






How One Family Escaped A War With Help From GE - Together We Work - GE - 播放時間：4 分鐘 39 秒。
General Electric 


4 個月前觀看次數：65,451 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKWhen the Zarrini family went on a summer vacation to beautiful Beirut, Lebanon in 2006, they never expected to wake up in a war zone. This is t...
    








 







 2:07

播放下一部立即播放






The GE Employee That Brings Water Skiing Into The Classroom - Together We Work - GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 7 秒。
General Electric 


4 個月前觀看次數：279,468 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKGrowing up as a proud member of the little town of Scotia, New York, Kevin Kaiser split his time between walking on water with the U.S. Water S...
    








 







 4:11

播放下一部立即播放






GE Engineers Save Countless Lives In The Wake Of Tragedy - Together We Work - GE - 播放時間：4 分鐘 11 秒。
General Electric 


3 個月前觀看次數：63,754 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKSince 2011, GE medical technicians have volunteered to staff temporary hospitals during the Hajj— the longest running mass assemblage on Earth—...
    




顯示完整資訊






已隱藏這個項目










GE Science & Series
























8 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Fiction Fast Forward - GE - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























20 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Innovation & Invention - GE - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























10 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







GE Super Materials - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























45 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







#SpringBreakIt - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























124 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Focus Forward - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























12 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Sally Le Page: Creator-in-Residence! | GE - 播放清單
General Electric 

 







 

 









已隱藏這個項目






 


GE 360 Video


全部播放





 







 2:06

播放下一部立即播放






GE 360 - Tier 4 Locomotive Experience - GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 6 秒。
General Electric 


1 年前觀看次數：236,441 


        Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKGE works on things that matter. The best people and the best technologies taking on the toughest challenges. Finding solutions in energy, heal...
    








 







 3:12

播放下一部立即播放






GE 360 - Testing the 9HA Gas Turbine - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘 12 秒。
General Electric 


1 年前觀看次數：33,645 


        Description: GE's Creator-In-Residence Sally Le Page continues her journey through GE's largest gas turbine manufacturing facility.Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKGE works ...
    








 







 3:51

播放下一部立即播放






GE 360 - Inside a Gas Turbine Factory - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘 51 秒。
General Electric 


1 年前觀看次數：132,963 


        GE's Creator-In-Residence Sally Le Page visits GE's largest gas turbine manufacturing facility. Subscribe to the GE Channel: http://invent.ge/1eGgvZKGE works on things that matter. The best peop...
    








 







 2:02

播放下一部立即播放






360 Video - Global Research + Aviation - The GE Store - 播放時間：2 分鐘 2 秒。
General Electric 


10 個月前觀看次數：91,255 


        What is the GE Store? It’s shorthand for the way we apply world-class research, technology innovation across our businesses and industries. Travel 30,000 feet in the air to see how our Global Resea...
    








 







 2:06

播放下一部立即播放






360 Video - Digital + Renewable Energy - The GE Store - 播放時間：2 分鐘 6 秒。
General Electric 


10 個月前觀看次數：86,226 


        What is the GE Store? It’s shorthand for the way we apply world-class research, technology innovation across our businesses and industries. Visit the world’s most connected wind farm to learn how w...
    








 







 1:54

播放下一部立即播放






360 Video - Healthcare + Oil & Gas - The GE Store - 播放時間：114 秒。
General Electric 


10 個月前觀看次數：166,577 


        What is the GE Store? It’s shorthand for the way we apply world-class research, technology innovation across our businesses and industries. Go down to the sea floor and see how advanced medical X-r...
    








 







 1:53

播放下一部立即播放






360 Video - Transportation + Power - The GE Store - 播放時間：113 秒。
General Electric 


10 個月前觀看次數：21,738 


        What is the GE Store? It’s shorthand for the way we apply world-class research, technology innovation across our businesses and industries. Get close to our industrial train engines to see how we t...
    




顯示完整資訊






已隱藏這個項目










Science & Technology - GE
























9 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







The Future of Healthcare - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























16 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Aviation & Transportation - GE - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























20 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Innovation & Invention - GE - 播放清單
General Electric 

 























7 部影片
  








全部播放
          




立即播放







Energy and the Environment - GE - 播放清單
General Electric 

 







 

 









已隱藏這個項目










GE #DRONEWEEK


全部播放


        5 days. 5 facilities. 1 re-engineered drone flying coast to coast. Don’t miss the badass machines. #DRONEWEEK
    







 







 1:03

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK Rio – The Tech Behind the Rio 2016 Olympic Games - 播放時間：63 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：12,26811 個月前 









 







 3:07

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK Rio – Day 1 – Opening Ceremony - 播放時間：3 分鐘 7 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：63,8821 年前 









 







 1:23

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK Rio – Day 2 – Paddler Diagnostic - 播放時間：83 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：19,8811 年前 









 







 2:06

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK Rio – Day 3 – From Human to Subsea Diagnostics - 播放時間：2 分鐘 6 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：4,8321 年前 









 







 2:47

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK Rio – Day 4 – Powering the Rio 2016 Olympic Games - 播放時間：2 分鐘 47 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：6,4281 年前 









 







 2:32

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK Rio – Day 5 – Intelligent Light - 播放時間：2 分鐘 32 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：2,4971 年前 









 







 1:41

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK - 播放時間：101 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：16,1912 年前 









 







 0:44

播放下一部立即播放






GE #DRONEWEEK On Periscope - 播放時間：44 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：29,5032 年前 









 







 3:46

播放下一部立即播放






GE DRONE WEEK - Houston, Texas - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘 46 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：3,1602 年前 









 







 3:16

播放下一部立即播放






GE DRONE WEEK - Peebles, OH - GE - 播放時間：3 分鐘 16 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：2,2502 年前 









 







 2:46

播放下一部立即播放






GE DRONE WEEK - Tehachapi, California - GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 46 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：2,8982 年前 









 







 2:01

播放下一部立即播放






GE DRONE WEEK - Fort Worth, TX - GE - 播放時間：2 分鐘 1 秒。
General Electric 

觀看次數：2,0602 年前 








查看另外 1 項





 

 









已隱藏這個項目













        Featured Channels
    




 










GE Aviation - 頻道

訂閱已訂閱取消訂閱 








 










GE Power - 頻道

訂閱已訂閱取消訂閱 








 










GE Digital - 頻道

訂閱已訂閱取消訂閱 








 










GEreports - 頻道

訂閱已訂閱取消訂閱 











  

 
語言：
  
  中文



 
內容位置：
  
  台灣



 
嚴格篩選模式：
  
關閉



觀看紀錄 說明





載入中…
    






載入中…
    






載入中…
    


 關於
新聞中心
版權
創作者
廣告
開發人員
+YouTube
 條款
隱私權

政策與安全性
  
提供意見

測試新功能













載入中…
    














        處理中...
    









 
      如要將這部影片新增至「稍後觀看」播放清單，請登入帳戶

 

新增至
    





        正在載入播放清單...
    


 






